From the "GOSFILMFOND" cinematheque
The Suram Fortress
Cinematheque of the People's Commission
Georgia, 1922
Novel - legend by
DANIIL CHONKADZE
Written and directed by
IVAN PERESTIANI
Director of Photography
B. SAVELYEV
Author's dreams...
The serfs.
Bastards!
In the evening Maria finds out that she just became a widow.
There is no justice!
Neither in Heaven or on Earth!
Your reward is in Heaven.
The landowner
... a month later...
I sold your children to the priest, you'll bring them to his place tonight.
Maria decides to run away with her children.
I'm taking the children to their new master.
At Imereti.
Dishonored.
The slave owners, the Zereteli Princes.
You have been talking to the servants again!
The dog faithful to its masters.
Tonight you will kidnap that lady's baby.
And you will take him to my sister in Tbilisi.
You must come tonight at our masters' garden.
Under the moonlight.
Waiting uselessly.
At Tbilisi
Princess Muhranskaja's palace.
The Duke sent him here for being educated.
The baby's name is Durmishhan.
A few years after...
Spring is coming.
The bells call the people to pray and repent.
Maria's children, who ran away to Tbilisi,
Had grown up and they are helping their mother.
The marketplace in the ancient Tbilisi.
Recluse.
She didn't confess for ten years now.
The secret was becoming a heavy burden.
Follow her and see where she lives.
The secret of confession wasn't respected.
The master discovered where his servants were hiding.
Tie them up!
The master's entertainment.
This is infamous and shameful!
I'm leaving!
Mother...
Kill him!
Revenge.
Farewell, my country.
Many years have passed.
The Duchess’s pupil, the maidservant Vardua.
Anna's son, Durmishhan. She drowned, and he was adopted by the Duchess Muhranovskaja.
Do you really love him that much?
I'll see that you get married, but first
I'll help you to become independent.
You hope to become a merchant?
I'll give you some money and a horse...
Go and find your happiness.
In the morning.
He's coming!
You must swear that you'll never forget me.
Hey, Durmishhan!
She had a bad feeling about his departure.
This is how these two men met
Brought together by a tragic destiny.
In Suram Osman-Agi had a little daughter.
Her name was Gajane.
They are coming!
After lunch.
Following desert roads she went to see the witch.
At the witch.
Take a look here.
Poor me!
As a matter of fact...
After leaving everything in Durmishhan's hands,
Osman, who appreciated him very much, gave him his daughter to marry.
Georgian party.
Caucasian dance.
Female dance.
Georgian fight.
...I am guilty of getting married...
... without your blessing...
That night.
Mother, teach me your ways, so that I can have my revenge.
Dozens of years have passed...
Time was flying,
Durmishhan became a respected merchant
One day a visitor arrived to see him in Tbilisi.
During the conversation the guest mentioned the famous witch named Vardua.
Forgotten...
They loved their only son very much, they were spoiling him
At the Mzheti palace.
My King, here's what we've seen along our borders.
At Ardagan in the Kura valley the Turks were descending.
Rebuild all our fortresses in the mountain passes!
Rebuild the fortress of Suram
Near the fortress walls.
There were only a few more bricks to lay.
It's the second time this happens.
This is a bad sign.
The wife and his child said goodbye to Durmishhan as he was leaving for a long trip to buy some merchandise.
Take good care of our son!
The fortress was being rebuilt for the third time.
The Tsar gathered The Council of Nobles and Wise Men of the People.
It came crumbling down three times, we'll rebuild it again
My Tsar, go to Vardua, she knows everything.
Take her advice
The Tsar accepts the proposal.
Avlabar.
Vardua's courtyard.
It has always been like this
Sit here!
Listen, at Suram there is Durmishhan, the merchant
He's got a son
...It already happened anyway... we have to close this boy into the walls...
Near the coasts of Anatolia Durmishhan was being attacked by pirates.
Back at home a tragedy is taking place.
Obscurity, ignorance, superstition
Bad news
She was going mad.
He is here.
He is high up there my son, Zurab!
I will find that evil woman!
Give me a horse!
He is high up there my son, Zurab!
Did you tell them to close my son into the walls?
Evil woman, what did he ever do to you?
Take a good look at me, Durmishhan!
Vardua?
Hold me in your arms, my love, the way you did a long time ago.
Time erases the past, relentlessly.
Only some old ruins are the witnesses of a dark age in which a beautiful country was fighting for freedom.
THE END translated and subtitled by finix http://radical-finix.blogspot.com
THE TREE MUSKETEERS
Life knows no age nor time. Youth will ever set out to seek fortune.
Man will ever fight for the love of a woman. Kings will threaten-Queens weep-Ministers conspire. And so-though our story is of three hundred years ago, It is as young as Yesterday or
To-morrow.
Then follow us to France of old.
To frery days when hearts beat high,
When blood was young, and hate was bold. When sword crossed word to dare and die. For love and honor gloried then. When live was live, and men were men!
In 1625 the Court of
France teemed with plot and counterplot, faction and cabal, enmity and jealousy-its men and women merely pawns in a game.
Louis XIII, the King, jealous, suspicious, easily moulded---
Cardinal Richelieu, the Prime Minister, iron willed, bent on being the sole power to dominate the King...
In another room in the palace...
Anne of Austria, Queen of France, whose influence over the King is the one obstacle in Richelieu’s path to power...
Constance Bonacieux...
Seamstress to the Queen...
Milady de Winter...
Father Joseph, the familiar of the Cardinal, fearsomely know as
His Grey Eminence...
Madam my Queen
I hear again how cruelly the Cardinal persecutes you. I pray you let me come to you that
I may throw around you the protection of the love you have ever scorned
Your mort humble slave
Bnechingham
In England, the Duke of Buckingham, whose mad infatuation for the Queen of France offers Richelieu the means for accomplishing his purpose…
Madame my Queen
I heard again how cruelly the Cardinal perseruter you. I pray you let me come to you that
I may throw around you the protection of the love you have ever scorned
Your mort humble slave
Bnechingham
Monsieur le Cardinal, your medicine.
The Queen has but now received a letter from Buckingham
I thank thee, Joseph.
That is very stimulating.
Your Queen is in danger.
Your queen is in danger- menaced by a knight.
Why do you harp on my Queen?
What do you mean?
I but spoke of your CHESS queen, sire.
Always double meanings.
Speak out, I command you.
What shall I say of the Queen save that she is profoundly devoted?
Devoted! To whom?
Not to me. She is in love with Buckingham!
I cannot but thing you are wrong, sire. If it were true, letters would have passed between them.
Letters! We shall soon see.
Madame, it is imperative that I see all your papers at once!
Your Eminence was right. There was a letter. Nothing about Buckingham.
Plenty about you.
To monsieur my Brother
The King of Spain
The humiliations put upon me by this odious Cardinal are becoming the gossip of every court. I beg you send an emissary to urge his dismissal
Your good sister
Anne R
Your Majesty knows that I have always warmly defended the Queen.
If she distrusts me I must bear it with humility.
In Tarbes, a town in the southern province of Gascony---
An impoverished nobleman sends forth his son to seek his fortune.
D'Artagnan
Remember, my son, that your ancient nobility gives you the right to the best in France.
You have thews of iron and wrists of steel. Fight on all occasions!
Fight the more since duels are forbidden, for that means double courage.
Never forget these things- loyalty to the King- reverence for the Cardinal- devotion to the Queen-
...and my pride in you... my love for you.
In Paris... fresh intrigue...
Milord
Come to Paris that I may say to you what I dare not intrust to a letter
Repenting the impulse that led to the humiliation of the Queen, the
King strives to make amends...
It took ten years to collect and match those twelve stones. They cannot be duplicated.
And the world says kings and queens are not happy!
I have come at a propitious moment to secure your signatures to a decree.
And D'Artagnan little realized, as he leisurely made his way toward
Paris, that he was soon to be enmeshed in a scandal involving the foremost courts of Europe.
What we do now promise is by our concurrence and consent.
Luis
Milord
Come to Paris that I may say to you what I dare not intriest to a letter.
Anne
Meet Milady de Winter at Meung. She is to deliver this letter to
Buckingham and remain in England until I send for her.
D'Artagnan takes every smile for an insult... every look as a provocation...
The Inn at Meung...
The exact shade of a buttercup!
The color is common enough in botany but... until now... very rare among horses.
Who laugh at my horse... laughs at me.
Pardon me, Madame.
I must kill your friend.
To Buckingham without delay... by order of Cardinal.
Coward!
Thus chance left these two men with a score unsettled... but they were to meet again.
Paris...
A horse for a hat.
Bonacieux, uncle to Constance...
Can you tell me where I might and lodgings?
Thus fate plays her part again...
Pardon me, mademoiselle.
Do you live in this house or that house?
Marvelous!
I desire to secure lodgings here.
In England... Buckingham receives the forget letter...
Milord
Come to Paris that I may say to you what I dare not intrust to a letter
Anne R
The letter has been delivered, madam.
In Paris, the next morning,
D'Artagnan calls on his father's old friend, the Captain of the King's Musketeers...
Monsieur de Treville, Captain of the King's Musketeers...
The ambition of his life... to be one of this...
Athos!
Porthos!
Aramis!
You Know that fighting is prohibited yet you fight... fight... fight!
And always with the Cardinal's Guards.
But if you MUST fight... fight as you did yesterday.
The three best swordsmen in Paris.
So you are from Gascony... and the son of my friend.
What hat brought you to Paris?
I came to join the Musketeers.
My boy, these Musketeers are all picket men.
All my life I've dreamed, I've hoped, I've prayed to be in your regiment.
Impossible! Serve your apprenticeship with the cadets for two years... and... we shall see.
My man of Meung!
Excuse me. I am running after someone.
You can find ME without running.
Do you understand?
Where?
Behind the Luxembourg.
When?
One o'clock.
Behind the Luxembourg.
Permit me to observe, monsieur, that in one respect you are absolutely perfect. You are the most perfect idiot I have ever met!
Behind the Luxemburg at one o'clock.
Possessed of Gascon courage,
D'Artagnan wasted not a moment in regret that his first day in
Paris had involved him with the three best blades of the time.
Behind the Luxembourg at one o'clock...
Gentlemen, I desire to explain...
If you kill me, I shall have been honored...
If I kill you, I shall regret it all my life... for I love you every one.
Monsieur Athos, on guard!
The Cardinal's Guards!
Hola! We are in luck!
You are under arrest
Come and take us!
We are four against three!
Pardon, Messieurs.
Four against Foul!
A young Gascon played me foul.
I'll find him and carve him to ribbons.
My young harpooner, perhaps you'll arrange time for me to show you how to use a sword correctly.
That is Bernajoux... the Cardinal best swordsman.
One for all and all for one.
Thus D'Artagnan, in two days, became the talk of Paris and won for himself the loyal comradeship that was to last throughout his life.
Richelieu lodges complaint that the
King's musketeers have assaulted his guards...
Remember! I cannot have the Cardinal annoyed. Those who disobey the edicts must be... punished.
Rest assured, Monsieur le Cardinal, these men shall be dealt with... properly.
I commanded you to fetch me these four devils who have so maltreated seven of the Cardinal’s best men.
Where are they?
But where is that young cadet?
You rascal... you have kept the King waiting!
So you are that wild Gascon who fights a regiment single-handed?
For the future I shall expect you to be discreet.
But TOO discreet.
I have a servant for you... a fellow who reflects before he acts.
I found him on a bridge, spitting in the water to see which way the river was glowing.
Your province?
Picardy.
As Richelieu's plans begin to mature, Constance makes ready to keep a mysterious appointment...
Certain messages have been confided to you. Tell me what they are and to whom they are to be delivered.
I dare not delay. Midnight is striking.
It is the hour I am expected.
Do not question me.
My mission is secret.
Who is he?
Stop, in the name of heaven!
His Grace, the Duke of Buckingham.
Lead on. I'll follow. If anyone looks at you I shall kill him.
The river entrance to the palace...
Milord, you have been told that it was not I who wrote to you... yet you rashly insist on this interview!
What does it matter?
Nothing matters but that
I see you again.
You see me at the risk of my honor... rat the risk of your life.
So sweet a voice can never pronounce the words that separate us.
...the depth of seas,
...the enmity of kingdoms...
...the sanctity of vows!
I beseech you... relent.
Then something for remembrance... something that you have worn... a ring... a chain... a brooch... that I may wear it always.
And now, Madame, your Majesty and I share a secret.
The last of the King's gold...
Richelieu prepares to make use of the Queen's secret...
How many days away is the court ball?
Twelve.
Go to England. Deliver this to
Milady de Winter.
While poverty still stalks the four friends, Aramis has secured for himself an invitation to dine...
Father, I have a friend I know you'll like. He's outside now.
May I Bring him in?
I trust I am not intruding.
Father, I have a friend outside... a fine fellow.
Monsieur de Cardinal,
YOU always win!
When I have bent my energies to a purpose, I have never failed.
D'Artagnan invites his friends to dine...
I wagered D'Artagnan that he could not provide a dinner without money.
Does he think Paris is paved with food?
Patience, my friends. This Gascon has a fashion of winning his wagers.
Certain fortune favored members of the Cardinal’s Guards are gathered for a feast...
Marvelous!
Intruder! How dare you meddle with our dinner!
Pardon, monsieur.
MY dinner.
I would allow you to get your swords, but... really, Messieurs... the dinner is not worth it.
Porthos must pay.
While in the palace, the Queen, who has been to a fancied security, receives a rude awakening.
Madame, I wish to remind you that the court ball is only six days away. I request you to honor me by wearing to it the diamond buckle
I recently gave you.
This is the end! I am lost!
Ten minutes later Constance arrives at home...
Can I trust you?
I love you.
As rivers love the sunlight.
Are you sure?
I would give my life for you.
This may mean your life.
Go to England. Get the jewels from the Duke of Buckingham and return in all haste. The Queen's happiness, her life, her honor are in your hands.
When you come back.
Find Porthos and Aramis and me at De Trevilles.
Bonacieux sells his information...
Search Paris. If D'Artagnan is within the gates, fetch him to me.
On perilous expeditions of this kind you must pay toll.
Four must start if one is to arrive.
All for one and one for all!
Be at the Barriere du
Nord in half an hour.
See that the way to Calais... and beyond... is made unsafe.
His Eminence presents his compliments and desires to see you at your earliest convenience.
At your EARLIEST convenience.
D'Artagnan is below.
When I drop this handkerchief... fire.
You were about to leave Paris,
Monsieur D'Artagnan?
We can make it VERY COMFORTABLE for you in Paris.
It is imperative that I go.
Monsieur D'Artagnan, if you were about to die, what would you do?
Your Eminence, I should write the history of France.
And what would you say?
I should speak of her great men,
Monseigneur.
Whom do you call great?
Monsieur le Cardinal,
Duc de Richelieu.
And what would you write of him?
That he is a great statesman...
...a great poet...
...a great swordsman.
You, yourself, are somewhat of swordsman.
By the way... what trick you employed to best my man, Bernajoux?
Thus four men rode forth in the service of their Queen...
That is D'Artagnan.
Porthos pay toll...
An inn near Calais...
Athos pay toll...
The port of Calais from which
D'Artagnan plans to sail...
NOTICE
THE PORT IS CLOSED
AVIS
LE PORT EST FERME
The port will remain closed until you receive further orders from the
Cardinal.
It shall be as you say,
Count de Rochefort.
My man of Meuhg!
You are on the Queen's business, master.
In England...
Buckingham wears a buckle set with twelve diamonds. Let possession of this and fetch it to me at once.
Richelieu
Good! Say to His Eminence that I am attending the Duke's fete to-morrow night.
Under the cover of midnight...
Watch every boat for my return and have the horses ready.
Set sail for England this instant or I'll blow out your brains!
My heart fails me. Ever foot of this road is sown with danger.
I'll stake my life he is near the shores of England at this moment.
You love him?
The fete at the palace of the
Duke of Buckingham...
To the harbour.
That is Milady de Winter.
Milady de Winter has just left your house... bound for the harbour.
She is a friend of Rochefort, a tool of Richelieu. She has the jewels!
The boat leaves in half an hour.
Perfect!
After you leave Calais, go by way of
Boulogne. This ring will get you fresh horses along that route.
Next morning... just before the ship drops anchor at Calais...
We go by the long route. No food, no sleep, no rest until we reach Paris.
The inn near Calais...
Has Monsieur D'Artagnan passed this way?
Then he has gone by the longer road.
We can reach Paris ahead him.
Drive on.
The evening of the court ball...
You bungler! I place the resources of a Kingdom at your command and you fail. Imbecile!
Guard every entrance to Paris.
Line the streets. D'Artagnan must not pass.
Go to the ball. Join the Queen... never leave her for an instant.
Block every way that leads to the palace.
Arrest that seamstress, Constance.
D'Artagnan... dead or alive!
The grand ball room of palace...
Her Majesty is late. I trust she will not forget that you desired her to wear your gift of jewels.
At the gates of Paris D'Artagnan scents danger...
Our luck runs too high.
I smell the Cardinal.
Madame, why do you appear here without your diamond buckle?
Sire, I feared some accident might befall it.
You do wrong to slight my wishes!
This is Fate!
This is for Meung... and this for Constance!
Your Queen.
My brave D'Artagnan, let this token ever remind you that you have won the eternal gratitude of a Queen.
Constance has disappeared.
Joseph, I never acknowledge defeat,
I make use of it.
If you were about to die, what would you do?
Your Eminence, I should still write the history of France.
Then set down in your book, Monsieur
D'Artagnan, that Richelieu was a generous foe.
Marvellous!
And now, Monsieur D'Artagnan, what say you to a lieutenancy in my Guards?
Your Eminence, my dreams, my hopes, my ambitions are all with the
Musketeers.
I am offering him a commission in my Guards.
A commission in the
King’s Musketeers.
And so, later in the evening,
De Treville presents to the King a new Musketeer...
'D'Artagnan!
So thus they lived in
France of old,
When blood was young and hearts were bold,
And sword crossed sword for honor then,
When life was life and men were men.
Ripped with SubRip 1.17 and Verified by CdinT cdint@hotmail.com
I deliver perfection... and don't brag about it! :D
In the great Gold Rush, Alaska was the hope and dream of men, the ruthless siren of the Far North, beckoning thousands to her icy bosom.
Beckoning thousands to her unknown regions.
Chilkoot Pass was the great barrier to the gold fields.
Over this Pass men faced untold misery and hardship.
Many lost their lives.
Some fell by the wayside, others lost courage and turned back.
But the brave went on.
Far into the icy north, deep into the silent nowhere, came an undaunted lone prospector.
And somewhere in that nowhere was another lone prospector.
With cheerful optimism our little Columbus descended, then stopped, stepped, slipped and slid.
"Now let me see", thought the little fellow.
"Before I know where I am,
I must get there."
There in that frozen wilderness a dream came true, and a lone voice shrieked into the solemn sky,
"Eureka! I've found it, a mountain of gold!"
But the elements laughed, roared and thundered.
In that raging nowhere was a lone cabin, and another lone man,
Black Larson, an unmitigated, predatory scoundrel.
Out of the lashing storm came the Little Fellow to find shelter and perhaps a little hospitality.
There he sat, resting his weary bones as the icy wind howled through the knothole.
"Come here", said Larson.
"What are you doing?"
"Eating, obviously."
"Get out."
"Go on!"
"Get out!"
The wind also was giving
Big Jim his troubles.
Big Jim was the noble type.
He had suffered.
Oh, how he loved to suffer.
He suffered about everything.
"Get out", said Black Larson.
"Or I'll fill you both full of lead."
"Now then, the pair of you, get out!"
"Out!"
That kind of noise
Jim don't tolerate.
"I'll stay right here, understand?"
"Right here", said Big Jim.
"Yes, sir, he'll stay right here", said the Little Fellow.
"Understand? We stay right here."
And stay they did, for days and nights.
The cabin moaned and groaned.
Two men walked and never talked, hunger gnawed their bones.
"I must have food!" yelled Big Jim.
"I must have food!"
"What are you eating?"
Said Black Larson.
"Nothing."
"Open your mouth!"
"Liar! It's that candle."
"That?" said the Little Fellow.
"How revolting."
"If I thought you were holding out on me, I'd slit your gizzard!"
"One of us must brave that storm, if we're to get food."
"Come here, the pair of you."
"We'll cut the cards and the low man goes."
"You're the man", said Jim.
"Goodbye, good luck."
"Don't forget to bring home the bacon."
Somewhere in that nowhere, the law was looking for Black Larson.
Desperate with hunger and here it was Thanksgiving Day.
Nevertheless there was something to be thankful for.
"Not quite done yet, give it two more minutes."
"Come on, come on", said Big Jim.
After scouring the country for food, the Little Fellow had to admit he had seen nothing, not even a field mouse.
From the pangs of hunger,
Big Jim was becoming delirious, hysterical.
In fact he was a pain in the neck.
"Food, food!" he thundered.
"I can put another shoe in the pot."
"No, no, anything but that!"
Poor Jim, he couldn't take it.
"What's the matter?"
Said the Little Fellow.
"I thought you were a chicken."
"Well, build up the fire", said Big Jim.
"What's the matter with you?"
Said the Little Fellow.
"Come, my pretty bird", said Big Jim.
"Don't be childish."
"Hey, quit it.
Don't be foolish, it's me!"
"You!" said Jim.
"I'm sorry. I must be crazy."
"You're telling me", said the Little Fellow.
"You go inside. I'll take the gun in case you lose it."
Chicken or no chicken, the Little Fellow looks appetizing to Big Jim.
Meanwhile Black Larson stumbled onto Big Jim's mountain of gold.
Then came the parting of the ways,
Big Jim to his mine, our hero to his fate.
"Goodbye", said the Little Fellow.
"It's been a great pleasure knowing you."
Treachery awaited Big Jim at his mountain of gold.
Big Jim looked deep into the eyes of Black Larson and saw there the soul of a skunk.
Caught in a maelstrom of desperate deeds,
Black Larson swept on to impending doom.
And out of a dream in that frozen waste, a city grew.
And humanity warmed it with living, loving and desiring.
Georgia.
Jack was a ladies' man.
Georgia was quick and impulsive, proud and independent.
In the evening Georgia worked as a dancehall girl.
Jack had lots of appeal for Georgia.
Perhaps that's why she resented him.
Out of the night came the Little Fellow, towards the dancehall, that beacon light of pleasure, that retreat of lost dreams.
"Georgia, why aren't you nice to Jack?"
"I believe he really likes you", said the girl.
"He likes everybody", said Georgia quite audibly.
"I'm bored with this place", she continued.
"I'd give it all up if I could find someone honest and worthwhile."
"Don't worry,
I'll find him someday."
Then she turned and looked and looked and looked.
"Kinda fresh, ain't ya?"
Thought Jack.
"Get down off that high horse."
"Me and you are gonna dance."
"Hey there, pan out a tune."
"Just a moment,
I said we're gonna dance."
"I beg your pardon", said Georgia.
To show her utter contempt for Jack, she picked out the most deplorable looking tramp in the dancehall.
"Hey you, come here."
"Yes, you. Do you want to dance?"
"You see, I'm very particular about whom I dance with."
And there he stood, the dauntless cavalier, guarding... her sanctuary.
"If you wanna make a hit with your lady friend",
"you should put your hat on straight, like this!"
"Take that you... Ouch!"
"Huh! Very good."
"Didn't know me own strength", said the Little Fellow.
Hank Curtis' cabin was a stone's throw from the dancehall.
Hank was a mining engineer who lived alone and occasionally went on long expeditions into the Far North.
Hank was kind and human, and our hero cold and hungry, and the beans smelled good and the coffee was steaming hot.
So the Little Fellow devised a way of getting breakfast.
Big Jim recovered from the blow he received from Black Larson but lost his memory.
Hank's partner arrives.
Both are ready to leave on a long expedition.
Hank informs his partner that the Little Fellow is to look after the cabin while he's away.
"Goodbye", said Hank.
"And don't forget to feed the mule."
Since that night in the dancehall the Little Fellow hadn't seen Georgia, but an incident was to bring them together again.
There she stood, her loveliness lighting the room, filling his soul with the music of romance for which he was so ill-fitted.
As she introduced her friends, his heart began to sing.
As they warmed up by the stove, he excused himself to get firewood.
And in that cabin his secret was revealed, his love for Georgia.
And the girls giggled and laughed, perhaps in order to hide their pity.
For in the world of the dancehall it wasn't wise for the girls to reveal their hearts.
And so they thought they'd have a little fun with him.
There in the gloaming they sat, their faces alight with mischief, but all the while his heart was singing.
And so she fooled and flirted and stroked his hair.
He knew she was fooling, but he was happy.
For she was near him, holding his hand, smiling at him.
"Nice place you have here", said Georgia.
"I hope you will invite us again."
What if she were fooling?
He was enjoying the warmth of her attention.
And the lady was enjoying the warmth of his chair.
And now she was leaving.
The light of her loveliness would be gone.
And he would be left with an emptiness, to return to his bleak, lonely existence.
"Pardon me", said the Little Fellow,
"But, uh..."
He was lost for words.
"Would you really like to come again?"
"Of course", said Georgia.
"What do you say, girls?"
"We'll come for dinner
New Year's Eve", said the ladies.
"Very well", said Georgia.
"We'll come to dinner
New Year's Eve."
Of course at that moment
Georgia would forget her gloves!
For the next few days the Little
Fellow hustled and shoveled in order to buy that New Year's dinner.
The eve of a new year.
New hopes and new dreams.
And there was Georgia, caressing him with her smiles and tender glances.
And the girls called for a speech.
But he was too happy to speak.
All that mattered was Georgia was there. Georgia!
So he muttered and stuttered and finally said,
"I can't make a speech but I'll do a dance."
And a dance he did, with the rolls.
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
And never brought to mind
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
And days of auld lang syne
For auld lang syne
My dear
For auld lang...
In the midst of all their revelry the vague memory of a promise crept into Georgia's mind.
"Let's go up and visit the Little Fellow", she said.
"We'll have some fun with him", said Jack.
"We'll send Georgia in first, then give him a scare."
"Oh, forget it", said Jack.
"How about giving me a little attention?"
A day or so later in the Recorder's office,
Big Jim tried to convince the assayers that he had a mountain of gold.
"Where is this place?" they said.
But Big Jim's memory had failed him.
All he knew was that it was near the cabin.
"The cabin, that's it!"
"F I could find my way to the cabin
I could find the mine."
"But I can't remember."
"Hey!" said Jack,
"Georgia's been looking for you."
The Little Fellow knew otherwise.
How dare that cad mention her name so lightly?
For two pins he'd give him another thrashing.
However being a little underweight he would ignore the insult.
But it was true.
Georgia had been looking for him.
Georgia had written him a letter.
And as he went looking for Georgia, so Big Jim went looking for him.
"You, you!" said Big Jim.
"You! The very man
I've been looking for!"
"The cabin, the cabin! Where is it?"
"Answer me, I say!"
"Can't you speak, man? Tell me!"
"Where's the cabin? Where is it?"
"At last I shall find my mountain of gold."
"To your feet man, quick!"
"You're coming with me!"
"Take me to the cabin and I'll make you a millionaire!"
"Georgia! Just a moment", said the Little Fellow.
"Georgia, you don't have to explain.
I understand."
"I love you.
I'll take you away from this life."
"I'm going away, and when I return",
"I shall come back."
Exhausted and footweary, they arrived at the cabin.
"Ah!" said Big Jim,
"it won't be long now."
"Bring in the eats and tomorrow we'll start for the mine.
"Here, take a swig of this.
It'll put hair on your topcoat."
"My, this is a heavy lamb chop", said the Little fellow.
Then fate - it's always fate - played its little joke, and again the elements laughed, roared and thundered, but through it all our heroes soundly slumbered.
Then came the dawn.
The Little Fellow awoke, blissfully ignorant of what happened the night before, but feeling definitely conscious of "the morning after".
"Oh well, may as well tidy up and get breakfast."
"This is the worst liver attack
I've ever had."
"Feel that rocking?"
"It's the stomach."
"It's not the stomach."
"Let's go to the other side."
"We'll see how far it will go over."
"Something must be missing underneath."
"I'll go outside and see what it is."
"Now", said Big Jim,
"don't get excited."
"Take it easy, don't move, don't breathe!"
"I said don't breathe, stupid."
"You can be most annoying at times."
"If you'll only be cool, be calm", said Big Jim,
"We have nothing to worry about."
"Now show a little character!
Where's your willpower?"
"Now listen,
I've got a very good idea."
"Hold your hands like this, then I can get out first."
"You see what I mean?"
Said Big Jim.
"Your mind is chaotic.
You have no psychology."
"You have no control."
And Big Jim discovered his claim!
"Now we shall be rich", said Jim.
"We shall be millionaires!"
And so they were.
Now they were homeward bound and they were leaving the hardship and toil of Alaska to live in the land of milk and honey.
To live, laugh and indulge themselves in the lap of luxury.
They were famous, and sought after by the press.
In their cabin deluxe they were welcomed and waited upon.
The reporter wanted to write the Little Fellow's life story,
"From Rags to Riches", and he graciously consented.
And Big Jim was manicured.
"Not the nails", said he,
"the corns".
The reporter thought of a good idea, to have the Little Fellow pose in his mining clothes.
It would make a human story.
Georgia...
There she was in the steerage.
Neither knew of the other's presence.
Georgia overheard the officer say there was a stowaway aboard.
"You!" said Georgia.
"I thought I'd never see you again."
And then she mistook him for the stowaway.
The officer was going to put him in irons.
But Georgia pleaded for him and said she would pay his fare.
"Heck!" said the Captain.
"That's no stowaway."
"That's Big Jim's partner, the multimillionaire."
Then of course there were apologies.
The Little Fellow gathered himself together.
James, the valet, was told to prepare for an extra guest.
"Pardon me", said the reporter,
"but who's the lady?"
"Buzz buzz buzz!"
"Oh, you don't say!
Well, congratulations."
"This will make a great story, and with a happy ending."
And so it was.
A happy ending.
Subtitles by Sionann O'Neill
Subtitling: TVS - TITRA FILM
www.scifi-world.org
RUSClCO Company presents a new project: the first in the national history film in a fantasy genre by Yakov Protazanov, "Aelita" , based upon Alexei Tolstoy's novel of the same name.
The film is released with frame-by-frame cleaning of the picture and in a new musical arrangement using the works of composers
Alexander Skryabin,
Igor Stravinsky and Alexander Glazunov.
On December 4, 1921 , at 18:27 European Standard Time, all the radio stations on Earth received a strange message.
Anta... Odeli... Uta...
Anta... Odeli... Uta...
Anta... Odeli... Uta... ln charge of the Moscow radio station was engineer Los (N.M. Tseretelli).
Pass it immediately to the bureau of deciphering.
At the evacuation center of the Kursky
Railway Station.
Among the employees of the center was Natasha, engineer Los' wife.
Red Army soldier Gusev (l.P. Batalov) arrived from the front for recuperation.
The deciphering bureau failed to make out the mysterious radio.
- Couldn't it be a radio from Mars to our inventors?
Los' close friend and colleague - engineer Spiridonov (N.M. Tseretelli)
Anything's possible! Perhaps they on Mars got worried about you and me!..
Come here, happy newlywed.
Your wife is calling again. l can leave earlier today.
Come and meet me.
Anta... Odeli... Uta... 18-27
All Los' brain power and energy have been devoted to one task - to the trip to Mars, and in his imagination he often pictured...
Aelita the Queen
(Yu.l. Solntseva). lkhoshka, Aelita's favorite servant
(A.F. Peregonets ).
Tuskub the Ruler (K.V. Eggert).
Gor, keeper of the planet's energy
(Yu.A. Zavadsky).
A model of the apparatus built by Gor for observing the life on other planets. lt's a great discovery, but let it remain a secret... for everybody!..
Show me other worlds...
No one will know about it.
All right... ln the evening l'll meet you at the tower of radiant energy... ln the evening
Only to you l'll show the life on a neighboring planet.
Time to go back.
Tuskub may come and see us.
Touch my lips with yours, like humans do... on Earth.
Spiridonov spent all evenings at his friend's place, working with him on building a spaceship to fly to Mars. lf only we could find the source of energy that would overcome
Earth's gravity!..
From the first day Gusev had become the infirmary's favorite.
Nurse Masha (V.G. Orlova)
"Love me or not, honey!.."
" A soldier got no money!.." ln 1921 the railways had no lack of passengers.
Comrade Erlikh and his wife, Yelena
We don't provide quarters.
Go to the women's section.
You're so...
Get out of here!
What the cheek!
Victor, l have the address of an old acquaintance... Let's give it a try!..
That day they were distributing food rations at the evacuation center. l'm not angry... about the past,
Yelena. lntroduce me to him as your brother.
White bread...
Victor Karlovich Erlikh
Who's that character writing to you?
You're so charming that l cannot believe you would be so cruel to me...
You're jealous, aren't you?
The food Erlikh brought made it possible to have a feast that was rare for Moscow, and remember "the beautiful past" .
What the hell! lt's sour, this wine! l remember the wine we had before...
Oh!.. Before, all human relationships were so sensitive, delicate...
Yes... Before we had order...
The days went on... Los stubbornly continued his experiments.
After each failed experiment,
Los went on dreaming...
Anta, Odeli, Uta
Excuse me!.. l'm the Chairman of the House Committee, l do my duty.
You'll have to vacate your laboratory for a new tenant.
You know, we have met before.
Do you remember?..
This is Erlikh, our new tenant.
At the evacuation center, an active preparation for a show was going on.
Join us... We're having such fun!
Yelena was successfully carrying out her husband's instructions.
On the day of the show, Natasha received a food ration at the club.
As a Soviet functionary,
Erlikh was doing fine.
To Mr. Pavlov - one sack of sugar. l've brought sugar... We must hide it!
Hurry!.. l told you we could pluck that goose.
The evacuation center's people decided to outdo the academic theatres.
Comrade Gusev is our chief assistant director.
The chocolate is real! l have to go home. l got a lot of work.
At the distribution center, an unpleasant discovery was made.
The center's manager went for help to the Chief of the Criminal lnvestigation. lnvestigate it and, if necessary, search Erlikh's apartment. l've got talent. By God, l've got it... l'll prove to you!
Citizen Kravtsov, l repeat it again: l'm not hiring you. l believe you're incompetent.
For the lndian ink, it was necessary to go to Spiridonov.
Got tired, comrade?... l sympathize. l sympathize with you very much. l know everything... l found it in your coat's pocket...
You're lying. You're lying all the time!..
The night seemed agonizingly long after that first quarrel.
Would you like to go to a ball and have fun in spite of all the comrades?
To engineer M.S. Los.
The administration of Volkhovstroi thanks you for almost a year-long work...
Will you go?
Kravtsov decided to investigate on his own the case of the lost sugar.
The meeting place of "businessmen" ...
All tickets are sold out.
You'll make good money!
What a miser! ln a whole week, just one medallion!..
Each reminder of the mysterious radio made his fantasy work with a new force.
For many days now Aelita could not see Earth and...
Today is the meeting of the elders.
No one will know if you go to the tower.
How dare you hide from me the apparatus built by Gor?!
You're a queen, but we're the rulers.
The tower will remain closed.
So, by the decision of the elders, a third of the living workforce is put into cold storage for keeping.
All the workers - the population toiling for the " elders" , never left their dungeons.
The first third to the cold storage!
The first third!
Are you avoiding me, Aelita?..
Your thoughts are occupied with an Earthman..
Wait for me here. l'll come out to you.
Martians were not alien to a feeling of jealousy...
You're in love with an Earthman.
You will never see him! l'm leaving with you all the designs of my "interplanetonef" .
Save them. This is the work of my life.
Are you going alone?
How about Natasha?!
Natasha was impatiently waiting for her husband...
Let's go to the ball. There'll be a most select society there. l'm sure your husband won't mind.
Let's go!.. To spite him!..
Let's have fun!
Anta, Odeli, Uta lllegal ball of the " select society" .
The ball's organizers talked Natasha into having supper with them. l thought you were at the station seeing off your husband going on a trip.
My ravishing, my dear.
Stay at least for half an hour.
Well, a quarter of an hour. l have to leave today. l regret l couldn't say goodbye to you. l may be on this business trip for a long time. Yours, L.
The only joy for Los was the realization that he, too, could take part in the great work of building the new Russia.
Slowly, yet inevitably, life was taking its normal course, and there was less and less work at the evacuation center...
Allow me to go and see off this torturer...
Moscow. March 3, 1922. lt's been over 2 months since your departure, and in this time you've sent me only 3 postcards. lf it's the end...
Krasnopresnensky District
SOVlET
MARRlAGE
REGlSTRY OFFlCE
With the evacuation center closed,
Natasha went to work in a kindergarten.
Los' business trip was coming to an end.
To engineer M.S. Los.
The administration of "VOLKHOVSTROl" thanks you for your 6-month work.
Dear friend! lt's been 2 months now since l left Russia... for good. l feel ashamed to admit it, but the ways and habits of the past proved stronger than me... l hid your designs in the fireplace in your room, where...
And the dream took hold of him again. ln his dreams Los disguises himself as Spiridonov. lt's strange... He hasn't showed up for two months, and today he appears as though he fell from another planet.
The new crime was promising new laurels for Kravtsov.
A suspicious character.
We must found out who he is.
At one of the out-of-the-way outskirts of Moscow.
Kravtsov at his work.
Don't touch it! By this glove l'll find the criminal.
The absence of foreign and home fronts, as well as the enforced inaction, burdened Gusev. l can't do nothing! l've established four republics, and now l'm going sour here...
Hot on the trail. l'm arresting you on a charge of...
Do you have a warrant?!
About the flight... l'll go with my great pleasure!...
Think it over, comrade. lt's a lot of risk and very little profit...
The heights l'm reaching! l'm flying to Mars tomorrow!
On the eve of the flight, the last workers were let to go home.
Next morning Moscow was celebrating one of the great Revolution days.
Where a good detective cannot ride, he will walk.
Five minutes before the flight.
- We're flying! We're flying!
Engineer Spiridonov, you're under arrest for unauthorized return to the RSFSR and murder of engineer Los' wife.
Some Pinkerton! Couldn't tell a false beard and a wig. ln that case... Engineer Los, you're under arrest for... living under someone else's disguise.
This projectile is coming from Earth!
The observatory will fix the time and place of the projectile's fall.
The aliens from Earth must be destroyed.
You must not do harm to the aliens from Earth.
They'll be destroyed! We won't let the plague of earth mutiny onto Mars! l know the time and place of the projectile's fall.
The " elders" did not leave, waiting for the Observatory's report.
Hurry to meet the guests from
Earth and bring them to me.
The moment indicated by Chief
Astronomer was nearing.
Comrades, are you from the militia?..
A man here must be arrested.
May l introduce myself? Commander
Gusev from the Budyonny Cavalry.
Tuskub! Tuskub!
This is an Earthman!
Comrade Tuskubov, allow me, by my mandate, to arrest the criminal Los who arrived on your territory.
Touch my lips with yours, like you do it on Earth...
Do you recognize this necklace,
Tuskub?!
"Love me or not, honey!.."
" A soldier got no money!"
You're mine! We'll be ruling over everybody here together!
Never! Never will l forgive myself for raising my hand against you!
Aelita, on the " elders'" orders, this Earthman is under arrest.
The free speech of free men has won over the " elders'" thousand-year hypnosis.
Comrades! Only you can help yourselves!
We had the same situation.
Everything began with...
October 25, 191 7
...following our example, comrades, form one working family of the Union of Soviet Socialist
Republics of Mars. l'm with you! l will lead you! l don't believe her... lt's not for the masters to make revolutions!
You've got power.
Lay down your arms, you will never need them again on Mars.
Victory! The troops are on our side!
Open fire on the insurgents!
Drive them back to the dungeons! l alone will reign and rule now!..
ANTA, ODELl, UTA
Buy tires by
ANTA, ODELl, UTA
Buy tires by
ANTA... ODELl... UTA!!
We're exposing the mysterious radio - it's our tires trademark.
We're going to the Far East Front.
Our train will be in an hour.
And l've been dreaming again...
Half an hour ago l killed my wife...
But l'm not running away, no... l'll go back to her...
We can't leave the man like that.
He may need help! l was insane when l was shooting at you... l'll be thanking providence all my life for having missed.
Do you still have any doubts?..
No, l believe you... Forgive me.
By the order of a court investigator, you're under arrest.
Enough of dreaming. A different, real work is awaiting all of us!
THE END www.scifi-world.org
THE HOLY MOUNTAIN premiered on December 17th, 1926.
The reconstruction was based on two nitrate copies: a tinted version from the
Bundesarchiv-Filmarchiv, Berlin, and another one in black & white from the Fondazione Cineteca Italiana, Milan.
The intertitles were - when available - taken from the copy of the Bundesarchiv-
Filmarchiv or corrected electronically.
Missing titles were added with the aid of the censor's certificate..
..from December 16th, 1926 that the
Deutsche Filminstitut -- DIF provided.
The restoration took place in 2001 in collaboration with..
..the Bundesarchiv-Filmarchiv, Berlin, the Fondazione Cineteca Italiana, Milan.. and the Friedrich Wilhelm
Murnau Foundation, Wiesbaden.
Lab: L'Immagine Ritrovata, Bologna
Friedrich Wilhelm Murnau Foundation
Those well-known sportsmen..
..who participated in the making of
THE HOLY MOUNTAIN..
..ask the audience not to mistake their performances for trick photography.
All shots taken outdoors were actually made in the mountains, in the most beautiful parts of the Alps, over the course of one and a half years.
The big ski race is performed by German,
Norwegian and Austrian master skiers.
The screenplay to this motion picture was inspired by actual events..
..that occurred during a twenty year period in the life of the great mountains.
THE HOLY MOUNTAIN
A Drama Poem with scenes from nature by Dr. Arnold Fanck
Dedicated to his late friend, mountaineer Dr. Hans Rhode with reverence
Direction and screenplay:
Dr. Arnold Fanck
Production design:
Leopold Blonder
Sculptures:
Karl Böhm
Nature photography:
Dr. Arnold Fanck and his Freiburg School:
Camera Operators:
Hans Schneeberger / Sepp Allgeier
Assistant Camera:
Albert Benitz and Kurt Neubert
Studio photography:
Helmar Lersky, Hans Schneeberger
Original score:
Edmund Meisel
CAST:
The Sportsmen:
The Dancer Diotima - Leni Riefenstahl
The Friend - Louis Trenker
Vigo - Ernst Petersen
The Mountain Guide - Hannes Schneider
Colli - Friedrich Schneider
The Actress:
The Mother - Frieda Richard
Produced by the cultural department of the
Universum-Film joint-stock company, Berlin
PRELUDE
There, where the rock falls steeply and defiantly into the surf... is her home--
The sea is her love, wild -- boundless --
But her life -- is dance -- vibrant expressions of a stormy soul.
Diotima's Dance to the Sea.
Diotima: Dancer Leni Riefenstahl
And so Diotima dances... dances to satiate her longing for him -- whom she has seen in her dreams -- atop the highest mountain peak.
END OF PRELUDE
TWO FRIENDS FROM THE MOUNTAINS
"The Friend"
Ingenieur Trenker
Vigo
Ernst Petersen, student of medicine
At the entrance to the Grand Hotel
DIOTIMA DANCES THIS EVENING
IN THE GRAND HOTEL
And Diotima dances in the country of her desire.
DANCE TO THE SEA -
DREAMBLOSSOM - DEVOTION
DREAMBLOSSOM
She seems ... almost holy!
Were any people from the mountains here?
Did you see my dance? --
What did you enjoy most?
The friend rushes upward, high into the mountains, to savor his overwhelming experience.
DIOTIMA'S ASCENT
A jubilant spring climbs higher up the mountain.
And a joyous Diotima immerses herself in it.
Just then, "the Friend" begins his lonely descent..
..from the icy brow of the tallest peak.
In an alpine meadow.
The mountainside reveals nature's ferocious power.
The imposing pinnacle of the highest mountain rises before her.
The meeting.
Did you come from up there?
It must be beautiful there.
Beautiful -- arduous -- dangerous
What does one search for, up there?
One's self.
And nothing else?
And what are you searching for, up here -- in nature?
Beauty!
And nothing else?
AT HIS HOME
AT HIS HOME
Today I climb in search of the most beautiful mountain that exists.
And tomorrow?
Tomorrow we will celebrate our engagement together -- very high up there.
You seek Gods -- but it's people you must find.
I suppose you came all this way just to see me, not the ski race.
Look for me at the jumping contest!
He wants to go up there again... without me.
Take me with you one time - into your world -- really high up --
At least up to the cottage.
"The Sea and the Stone
Can Never Be Wed."
Winter, still draped across his mountain.
Look -- those enormous rocks have been worn away..
..by the gigantic force of water, in nature's eternal cycle.
And all the debris left by these mighty waters -- they are our mountains.
Why is nature so beautiful to us?
Because we invest our very souls in it.
You, too, are like nature.
And that's why I love you so much.
The bustle of wintersports.
The bustle of wintersports.
The mountain guide
Hannes Schneider
Have you finished marking the race route?
How's the competition looking?
You'll probably be beaten.
By whom?
Colli... the shepherd.
Never.
Colli
Friedrich Schneider
Say, if your Friend doesn't participate, there'll be no competition in the long-distance run.
Take me with you!
What's wrong with you, darling?
FEAR!
I will be back in time for your dance tonight.
Goodbye -- until tonight!
The jumping event has begun.
Diotima goes to watch the ski jump.
Colli prepares for the his final jump.
In wonderful style,
Vigo determines the winner.
The young victor.
But far away from the sporting bustle, the Friend..
..seeking the most beautiful mountain
-- for tomorrow --
I'm not sure I can ride such a steep hill.
Now where would my beautiful, gentle Madonna like to go?
Wild and fantastic, like a gothic cathedral, rises from its mighty foundation --
-- the most beautiful mountain.
THE LONG-DISTANCE RUN
Come back the winner, and I'll grant you a wish.
The route is marked.
High atop his silent world.
Colli fights for the lead.
Colli leads.
75 miles per hour on skis!
Relentlessly pursuing Colli.
Vigo closes the gap!
Overtakes!
Vigo in the lead.
Colli far behind.
Vigo still leads.
The others continue the wild chase.
The two favorites find themselves far behind.
Don't give up, we're nearly the last!
Racing through the forest, they no longer notice the fairy tale beauty of the snow-covered firs.
Pushing for the lead.
Colli goes wrong
All wrong!
The end of the fight.
Just before the finish.
I'll get you yet!
Vigo -- Vigo!
He begins his descent into the valley.
May I have my wish now?
And what does the victor desire?
THE DREADFUL NORTH FACE
ABYSS!
ABYSS!
When he comes home today,
I have a surprise for him.
A new dance --
A Hymn of Joy
I really think... she loves me.
Well, finally you appear!
Come with me, I need you.
We must scale the Santo-north face.
Now? In Winter?
Are you mad?
You're my best friend. Come with me.
We'll be mad together.
I'll come get you.
I must go away... with a friend of mine.
-- a magnificent man, whom you should meet sometime.
The ski racers go to the cottage, to celebrate the day's events.
Whas has come over you?
Sorry, Vigo. It's not you.
But please do not ask.
To the north face of the mountain.
Before the dreadful Santo-north face.
Are you afraid to come with me?
Look, we should turn back.
The Föhn wind is coming down.
Let it come -- the stronger the better!
And let storm and avalanche roar their wild songs with it.
The very walls come alive with the flow of the avalanches.
It comes boiling up from the valleys in a terrible tempest.
TURMOIL!
TURMOIL!
Something must have happened to him!
Snap out of it!
Do you hear me?
You really are mad!
Take me back down again!
Is there something you desire -- down there -- among the rabble?
A dancer --
-- Diotima
It was you!
VIGO!
And Diotima must dance -- her hymn of joy.
I can't fasten you to anything!
It's all ice!
Vigo -- I'd never do anything to harm you!
I've gone with Vigo to conquer the Santo-north face
I can dance no more!
You cannot just walk out in the middle of a performance.
Our ski-master and his friend Vigo --
-- have not returned from the Santo-north face.
Are there mountaineers among you -- ?
Men who would climb up, through this night, up to Sella cottage, to alert the skiers?
Who among you will climb?
For my sake?
Was one man not enough for you?
Vigo -- ? He is but a child!
They're all -- children.
I am climbing up to the cottage.
I will find the way.
But no single man has the strength to lift a body from an overhang.
Sacrificing the comrade - perhaps one's self with him - the greatest dilemma of the mountains.
THE DEED
We drink to the welfare of our absent ski-master.
Nature unleashed!
Cut me free --
I can't bear it anymore.
At least save yourself!
Why... why?
How to we reach Mount Santo?
First down to the forest -- then over the bridge and up again.
Have you found the bridge?
Losing faith
Why?
HIS WORLD
And with the last of his strength, he holds his friend, long since frozen.
Dawn breaks upon his tormented soul.
A peaceful calm settles upon the frozen world, and upon the sould of Diotima, who at last learns the fate of her beloved.
Fallen!
He has fallen!
He held onto his fallen friend the whole night, and thus sacrificed himself.
Among us, the greatest attribute... is loyalty.
Peace lies upon the eternal sea -- silently it spreads, rolling out in broad waves, to soothe the world's suffering and strife.
Above it all looms a Holy Mountain -- a symbol of the greatest values than humanity can embrace -- fidelity -- truth -- loyalty -- FAITH
END
Music: Aljoscha Zimmermann
Ensemble
Sabrina Zimmermann - Violin
Antonio Clavilijo - Cello
Dieter Pöll - Percussion
Markus Steiner - Percussion
Aljoscha Zimmerman - Piano
Sound engineer - Thomas Schmölz
Recorded in April 2002
Violetmedia Soundstudio, Munich
Film transfer and digital postproduction
Wagner & TaunusFilm
(c) 2002 Friedrich Wilhelm
Murnau Foundation
DVD-Untertitelung:
Oliver Ullmann
The Western and Atlantic Flyer speeding into Marrietta, Ga., in the Spring 1861.
There were two loves in his live.
His engine,
And--
"Fort Sumter has been fired upon."
"Then the war is here."
"Yes, dad, and I'm going to be one of the first to enlist."
"Aren't you going to enlist?"
"Your name?"
"Johnnie Gray."
"Occupation?"
"Engineer on the Western and Atlantic Railroad."
"Don't enlist him. He is more valuable to the South as an engineer."
"We can't use you."
"William Brown."
"Occupation?"
"Bartender."
"If you lose this war don't blame me."
"Did Johnnie enlist?"
"He didn't even get in line."
"He's a disgrace to the South.
"Why didn't you enlist?"
"They wouldn't take me."
"Please don't lie. I don't want you to speak to me again until you are in uniform.
A year later. In a Union encampment just North of Chattanooga.
General Thatcher, and his chief spy, Captain Anderson.
"I Know every foot of this railroad from Marietta to Chattanooga, and with ten picked men I cannot fail."
"We will enter the South as civilians coming from the neutral state of Kentucky to join the southern cause."
"At Big Shanty we will steal the train while the passengers and the crew are at dinner, and proceeding North we will burn every bridge, cutting off the supplies of the army now facing you."
"Then the day you steal the train I will have General Parker advance to meet you."
"As soon as I arrive I will let you know how seriously father is wounded."
"Big Shanty.
Twenty minutes for dinner."
"Three men stole my General.
I think they are deserters."
"Why not stop and fight them?"
"I'm afraid they have us greatly outnumbered."
The Southern army facing Chattanooga is ordered to retreat."
General Parker's victorious
Northern army advancing.
"There is only one man on that engine."
In the enemy's country, hopelessly lost, helplessly cold and horribly hungry.
"At Nine o'clock tomorrow morning our supply trains will meet and unite with General Parker's army at the Rock River bridge."
"Then the army, backed by our supply trains, will advance for a surprise attack on the rebels left flank."
"Once our trains and troops cross that bridge, nothing on the earth can stop us."
"This girl was in the baggage car when we stole the train, so I thought it best to hold her."
"We had better stay here until daybreak to see where we are."
"It was so brave of you to risk your life, coming into the enemy's country, just to save me."
After a nice, quiet, refreshing night's rest.
"We've got to get back to our lines somehow and warn them of this coming attack."
"I will get that spy before he reaches the Southern lines. You follow with the supply trains as planned."
"We must pick up more firewood."
The Rock River bridge.
The Northern division nearing the bridge to meet the supply trains.
"That bridge is not burned enough to stop you, and my men will ford the river."
Heroes of the day.
"Is that your uniform?"
"I had to wear it to get through the lines."
"Take it off!"
"Enlist the lieutenant."
"Occupation?"
"Soldier."
Die Nibelungen
Die Nibelungen
Dedicated to the German People
Siegfried
Canto I
How Siegfried slayed the dragon
Thus spoke Mime, the artful blacksmith: "Siegfried, son of King Siegmund, ride home to Xanten. Even I cannot teach you any more!"
Have you never before heard of the king's castle at Worms on the Rhine and the kings of Burgundy who reign there?
I shall go there to win Kriemhild!
Show me the way to Worms or you will lose your life!
Farewell, Siegfried, son of king Siegmund. You will never get to Worms!
Young Siegfried understood the bird's song:
If the dragon slayer would bathe in the dragon's blood, his body would become invincible, forever safe against sword and spear!
Here ends the First Canto
Canto II
Now Volker, the bard, sang of Siegfried in front of Kriemhild, and how Siegfried came to Worms.
The violin sounded and Volker sang:
The dragon slayer, the son of Siegmund entered the realm of the Nibelungen.
He won the fight against the dragon.
There is no one on earth like him.
Thus spoke Alberich, the Nibelung: Spare my life and I will give you the wonder cap. Whoever wears it becomes unseen or may take whatever form he chooses!
Spare my life, O hero, and I will make you the richest king on earth!
The crown of the King of the Northland, the ruler of the Ice Giants is being wrought here by the Nibelungen.
No sword on earth compares with Balmung. The Nibelungen forged it in fire of blood.
All is lost. Cursed be the heritage of the heir!  Return with me to stone all ye whom from stone were wrought.
The violin sounded and Volker sang:
Siegfried became the dragon slayer
The lord of the Nibelungen Treasure.
Twelve kingdoms subdued the powerful. Twelve kings became his vassals.
Kriemhild, the daughter of Ute: "Volker, take this cloak, as reward for your song! I embroidered it myself.
Siegfried, son of King Sigmund, is outside the castle door with twelve of his knights, and asks for an audience with King Gunther.
Thus spake Hagen Tronje:  King Gunther, let the dragon slayer go his ways, don't welcome him here!
No one shall say that at Worms one does not know the way kings greet each other! Siegfried, son of King Siegmund, has my welcome!
I dreamt last night an awful dream...
And now this dream comes to my mind!
I come, King Gunther, to ask for your sister Kriemhild's hand.
King Gunther, too, has marriage plans. He has set his heart on a bold and mighty maiden.
Her name is Brunhilde and she is Queen of Iceland. Ringed by fire, her invincible castle towers in the Northland.
Why must you speak of Brunhilde?  You know she has set dangerous conditions: Thrice must the suitor best her in feats of strength or die!
Siegfried, the unique hero, has come to Worms at an opportune moment.  He may help us win Brunhilde for you!
Twelve kings have I for vassals.  But vassal am I to no man, now or ever!
Prepare for the quest to get your bride, King Gunther. It is Siegfried the mighty hero who will win Brunhilde for you. 
Here ends the Second Canto.
Canto III
How Siegfried won Brunhilde for Gunther
The dragon ship is carrying foreign heroes to your shores!
The foreigners are nearing the flaming sea.
If he be strong enough and favored by the gods, the flames will consume themselves and die.
My maidens, help me put on my armor, this will be a a fight I've never fought before!
Welcome, hero, for the fight for life or death!
Neither life nor death do I desire from you, Brunhilde.  It is King Gunther who woos you!
Before it is evening, King Gunther, your smothered weapons will adorn my hall.
Give me leave, King Gunther, to make ready your ship for your royal bride. We should set sail for home before sundown!
Let the triple battle begin, King Gunther!
You have to defeat me three times, o king: with the stone, the spring, and the spear.
Fear not, o king! Make you the motions and my strength will win each contest. I'll throw the stone for you and carry you in the jump.
Here ends the Third Canto
Canto IV
How Brunhilde enters Worms and how the kings celebrated their wedding.
Start the prepartions for marriage! The king's ship is arriving!
We have reached our destination, my queen!
Are you really the man who defeated me threefold?
I am your captive, but I shall never be your wife!
Keep your word, King Gunther, as I have kept mine!
If Kriemhild gives her consent, o hero, we shall celebrate a double wedding here today.
Since when is it customary among Burgundians to give the King's daughter in marriage to a vassal?
Siegfried is no vassal. I love him as though he were my brother.  We shall become blood brothers today!
Blood is mingling with red blood, the drops fuse inseparably.  Whoever forsakes loyalty to the bloodbrother will perish at the wayside, all honor is lost!
Brunhilde has been defeated, not cowed.  Shall the king of Burgundy be scorned by an obstinate woman?
Damned be the deed half done!  Will you forsake your friend who gave you his own sister?
The magic cap will change you into what you wish.  Take Gunther's form and break Brunhilde's iron will.
Here ends the Fourth Canto
Canto V
How, after half a year, Siegfried's gift to his bride, the Nibelungen Treasure, arrives in Worms and how the two queens quarrel with each other.
O king, Burgundy's glory is waning, we need the Nibelungen treasure.
It would be folly to reject what Siegfried offers you as a brother and Kriemhild is worth more than all the gold in the world!
See what I found!
Put away the armlet, Kriemhild, it guards an ugly secret. The Mistress of the Nibelungen Treasure has no need for it!
Listen, Kriemhild, at how I won the armlet - and keep silent!
The Nibelungen treasure has arrived!
How long, King Gunther, will Siegfried and Kriemhild tarry at the court of Burgundy?
They stay for the sake of my mother.  Would you, Brunhilde, be willing to take up the daughter's place for Queen Ute?
Your brother's honor is entwined with this armlet. It never should be seen again by human eyes!
It seems to me high time, King Gunther, that you send Siegfried back home to Xanten!
Never! He shall leave of his own freewill!
I am going to attend mass, my daughter. Follow me soon!
I'll go to the cathedral in the regalia of the queen of Burgundy!
The wife of a vassal may not precede the Queen of Burgundy!
How did you dare refer to Siegfried, my husband?
Siegfried introduced himself to me as Gunther's vassal and servant.  He did servant's work for my husband!
You, whom he disdained. You, whom he gave away. You dare to belittle Siegfried?
Make way for the Queen of Burgundy, vassal woman!
You recognize this armlet, you queen of Burgundy?
How came that armlet into your hand?
The carrier of the magic helmet who, disguised as Gunther, defeated you three times - Siegfried, my husband gave it to me!
King! Speaks your sister the truth?
Kill Siegfried!
Kill Siegfried!
Your babbling, hero, was worse than murder!
Kill Siegfried!
Siegfried is safe from your wrath.  None can slay the dragon slayer!
Save in one spot, where the linden leaf clung, is he vulnerable as other men!
King Gunther, let me deal with the dragon slayer!
We pledged blood brotherhood.  How can I be party to his death?
The one who took the armlet from me made me his wife, took my maidenhood from me!
Tronje, announce to the people of Burgundy that I invite everybody to a royal hunt to kill a mad dog and a ravening.
Here ends the Fifth Canto.
Canto VI
How Gunther betrayed Siegfried.
Can you keep a secret Kriemhild?
I once broke the oath to be silent and never will do so again!
Well then, the upcoming hunt might easily turn into a chase for men. A secret message warns me of war against Burgundy!
Good for you, Kriemhild, that your husband is the dragon slayer, the invincible!
Who warrants me that in the heat of battle not a chance blade should pierce where the lime leaf fell?
If you want me to protect him, I have to know the exact spot where the invicible could be hurt!
You are good counsel, you truest of true. I shall mark the spot with a little cross myself!
I come to take leave, Brunhilde.  We are starting for the hunt in the Odenwald forest.
Mind my vow, King Gunther, I shall not eat nor drink until my disgrace has been vindicated!
O my dear lord, don't leave me.  I dreamt last night a furious boar tore you to pieces!
O my dear lord, don't leave me.  I dreamt further that two mountains collapsed and buried you!
Today Gunther and I will reconcile.  Who else is my enemy?
Mother, I feel as if blood is draining from my heart!
The hunt in the Odenwald forest lasted from morning until sundown.
A handful of red gold for a cooling draught of white wine!
A wheel broke from the wagon loaded with wine. But I know of a cool brook nearby!
I always heard of you as the fastest runner of all heroes, let's run, you and I, for the first draught!
Gunther, my brother, let's be friends again!
When you are back from the spring!
Grim Hagen spoke:  "The hunt is over!"
Here ends the Sixth Canto.
Canto VII
How Kriemhild swears revenge to Hagen Tronje.
You may break your fast, Brumhild, Siegfried is dead.
Hail to you King Gunther! For the sake of a woman's lie, you have slain your most loyal friend!
I call to you for justice, King Gunther!  Hagen Tronje has slain my husband!
Loyalty for loyalty, Kriemhild.  His deed is ours. His fate is ours.  Our breast is his shield.
You might try to hide among my clan, behind the altars of God, or at the end of the world - You cannot escape my vengeance. Hagen Tronje!
Announce to King Gunther, my brother, the Queen of Burgundy is dead!
Thus ends the tale of Siegfried.
THE DIAMOND SHIP
Second Part of "The Spiders"
In the first part of The Spiders, millionaire adventurer Kay Hoog... thwarts the plan of the criminal Spiders organization... to steal the treasure of a lost Inca civilization...
Returning to America with Naela, a beautiful Priestess of the Incas...
He rejected the romantic advances of
Lio Sha, one of the Spider's leaders... and proclaims his love for Naela.
Returning home from a false mission... he finds the dead body of Naela, murdered by the Spiders...
Kay Hoog swears that Lio Sha will pay dearly for her jealous act.
The house of steel.
Lio Sha.
"Our organization works like a machine...
It's not our fault that we still have not found the stone.
The Diamond Ship..."
"Again the lost stone is not there. I will tell our clients about it this evening."
"And Kay Hoog?"
"Kay Hoog will not cross our path again...
...He has already learned the power of the Spiders."
Kay Hoog.
"I have finally arranged a raid on the suspected house."
"But why are you concerned with this whole affair?"
"I have an old score to settle."
"The raid is set for exactly 11 o'clock."
"I'll be there with you."
A modern raid.
"3 1/2 Carats... $70,000 going once... going twice..."
The secret of the many diamond thefts.
The next day.
An old bookworm.
"This is new proof of my suspicions.
Under the Chinese quarter exists...
...a secret Chinese city. This piece of ivory is the entrance key."
"Search for this sign in the shops of the Chinese quarter...
...there you will find the way to the subterranean city."
"But beware. The Police will give you no protection in the Chinese quarter...
...let alone in the subterranean city.
Remember - they deny it even exists!"
In the subterranean Chinese city.
"I must talk with the Captain of the Storm Bird as soom as possible...
...Our search here for the
Buddha-head diamond was in vain."
In one of the Chinese shops above the subterranean city.
"The Guards of Chinatown."
The gambling rooms of the Red Dragon.
"The Buddha-head diamond is not in the city...
...otherwise we would have found it."
"The diamonds were of no value ti us. Part of the proceeds...
...from their sale was deposited in a joint account, and part..."
"I'll stay another two days until the initial excitement in over...
...Then in the evening
I was board the Storm Bird and we can sail immediately."
"Kay Hoog is here."
"Release the woman and you are free to go."
But they were not to be trusted...
...As soon as Kay Hoog released her, he was overpowered and imprisoned.
Two days later...
"Will you make a deal?"
"How much?
Attorney Baker has little respect for the law.
"I heard that the Storm Bird is sailing for South America. Is that true?"
"I have a case of secret documents that must be delivered to a foreign...
...power outside of the United States.
The authorities must not learn of it."
"My client will pay
$10,000 now...
...and $20,000 upon delivery of the unopened case."
That evening.
WITH CARE
An episode in India.
"The Diamond Ship has not fulfilled its mission...
...The Buddha-head diamond has not been found."
"The Master will make a new attempt today to find the stone. Yoghi All-hab-mah...
...India's most famous clairvoyant will help in this holy cause."
A hypnotic-telepathic experiment.
"Find the Buddha stone, so that
Asia can become great and free...
...itself from foreign rule."
A heart attack.
Experiment successful. In hypnotic trance, Yoghi saw stone...
...in possession of Diamond magnate Terry London...
...whose ancestors stole the holy stone generations ago...
...Four-Finger John will make all preparations.
Change course immediately.
Dear Mr. Hoog: Here are the decoded contents of the secret document...
...About four hundred years ago, the Ming dynasty in China has...
...in possession a diamond, which because of its peculiar shape resembled the head of Buddha.
This stone was stolen and, so the story goes, Asia will free...
...itself from foreign tyranny when a Princess brings this stone back to Asia.
"Change course... head for England!"
John Terry, the diamond magnate, and his daughter Ellen.
"I must leave at once on important business."
Mr. Terry returns.
The Spiders have kidnapped your daughter. As ransom...
...we demand the Buddha-head diamond. You will hear from us.
The next day.
EXTRA!
SPECIAL EDITION!
5,000 POUNDS REWARD!
"The Storm Bird left the harbor tonight for an unknown destination."
On board of Storm Bird.
"I don't know what diamond you're talking about."
"It seems that the solution can only be found through
John Terry himself."
The Spiders have kidnapped your daughter. As ransom...
...we demand the Buddha-head diamond. You will hear from us.
"I don't know what they want from me.
I have never owned such a stone."
"And yet the secret must lie with you.
The Spiders do nothing that isn't...
...thought out. Isn't anything known in your family about such a diamond?"
"Perhaps one of your ancestors?"
"That's the founder of our family fortune...
...one of the most famous pirate captains of the sixteenth century."
"The logbook of the Sea Witch."
"I vaguely remember reading something in the Captain's logbook that...
...might have been a reference to the diamond shaped like a Buddha."
We went ashore on the coast of the Falkland Islands and found...
...our secret cache in the caves, as we had left it two years ago.
"A few pages in the logbook are missing here. What happened after distributing the loot...
...I don't know. Something terrible must have happened, because the logbook says only..."
I was the only one who could save himself.
"What happened... what catastrophe befell the unlucky sailors...
...there is nothing in the logbook.
Shortly thereafter, the Captain...
...died in a battle, and his successor brought the logbook and the picture to the family."
Many have tried to discover the secret of the hiding place...
...but no one has succeeded.
I hold my hand upon what is mine.
"An old map of the Falkland Islands."
"Four-Finger John!"
"Let's see if we can find any clues in his room to the whereabouts of Ellen."
"If you tell us exactly what has happened to Ellen Terry, we will...
...release you and give you the reward. Think it over."
"Ellen Terry was taken on board the Storm Bird...
...and is sailed immediately.
I don't know its destination."
"We will keep you here for 48 hours, to prevent sabotage of our plans...
...Then you are free."
"I will try to find the stone... the fate of your daughter depends on it...
...I will succeed or perish."
"Stone possibly on Falkland Islands...
...Kay Hoog on his way to find the diamond."
"Change the course of the Storm Bird at once!"
"I will force Ellen Terry under my will and make her the Princess...
...who will free Asia from all foreign tyranny."
"When she wears the Imperial Crown, all Asia will lie at our feet."
"A footprint!"
The treasure cavern.
"Give me the
Buddha-head diamond!"
"He has to have the stone.
I saw it in his hand."
"Hunger and thirst will make you talk."
The poisonous crater.
During the night, deadly fumes rose from the crater.
Weeks later, back in London.
"I was the only one who could save himself, and here is the stone."
"Shortly before you arrived,
I received a call from...
...the Pinkerton Detective Agency.
They think they have found a clue to my daughter.
"An elderly gentlemen has registered at the Royal Hotel with a young woman...
...Although she is supposedly his daughter, she fits the photo of the missing girl."
"I have been instructed to ask you to come along and identify the girl."
"We must be careful not to arouse suspicion...
...You can observe their room from here."
"Lio Sha is dead."
"The stone is lost forever."
"No one must know. For some time
I have been followed by Indian spies...
...The Asian Committee suspects me of being a double agent...
...since I haven't been able to produce the stone as I had promised."
"There is only one way to avoid disaster. Have a diamond shop cut...
...a stone that is just like the original.
That's the only way to fool them."
"Go to Amsterdam today. Spare no expense. It's our only chance."
"Ellen Terry is under my spell.
She is sleeping now."
"You have betrayed Asia...
...You and the woman who was going to usurp the Imperial Crown... you must die!"
"Your daughter appears to have been under a hypnotic spell...
...But she's awake now, and knows nothing of the past events."
THE END english subtitles transcribed by
.:: Norgen (norgen@centrum.cz) ::.
For decades The Lost World could be seen only in an abridged version...
...about an hour in length. This edition combines portions of eight prints...
...to present the most complete reconstruction believed possible.
Sir Arthur Conan Doyle's Stupendous
Story of Adventure And Romance
THE LOST WORLD
By arrangement with
Watterson R. Rothacker
Introducting Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, author of the story.
I have wrought my simple plan
If I give one hour of joy
To the boy who's half a man
Or the man who's half a boy.
LONDON
I have a presentiment that you are going to propose, Ed.
I do wish you wouldn't, for this are so much nicer as they are.
But why can't you love me, Gladys?
Now tell me what's amiss with me.
I will only marry a man of great deeds and strange experiences...
- a man who can look death in the face without flinching!
In the office of the
London-Record Journal.
I want your legal advice. Profesor
Challenger threatens to sue my paper... for doubting his yarn about live dinosaurs.
FAMOUS ZOOLOGISTS RETURNS FROM SOUTH
AMERICA WITHOUTH PROOFS OF STRANGE TALE
Profesor Challenger, well-known author and scientist, has returned to London...
...with a strange tale of Mammoths,
Pterodoctyls and other prehistoric monsters...
...roaming at large somewhere on the upper reaches of the Amazon. Unfortunately...
...for the professor's reputation for veracity, he refuses to give the exact location of his alleged...
...discoveries, and still more unfortunately, the photographs in his possession are so badly damaged...
(when the Professor's canoe is said to have been overturned)
...that they certainly cannot be acepted...
...as evidence in this case.
I believe Challenger is insane!
He nearly killed three reporters
I sent to interview him today!
Mr. McArdle, couldn't you send me on a dangerous assignment?
All I need is an opportunity -
You seem very anxious to lose your life!
Have you been interviewing
Challenger, Malone?
Don't apologize - hurry over to Zoological
Hall and cover Challenger's lecture.
Reporters are barred
- but get in!
There's Sir John Roxton
- famous hunter and explorer.
He's here to check up on
Challenger's cock-and-bull story.
Well, Malone, we're in for a lively session tonight.
- the students are out in force to heckle old Challenger.
Challenger has made himself a public laughing
- stock by his tale about live dinosaurs!
What can he hope to gain by such lies?
The back country of the
Amazon contains over...
...fifty thousand miles of unexplored water-ways.
Who can say what may be living in that jungle - as vast as all Europe?
But how can Challenger's story be true?
These creatures have all been dead ten million years!
You might at least do him the justice to hear him state his own case.
Reporters are barred-
...if I show my press pass I'll get kicked out. I wonder if you -
Gladly - I'll take you in on my pass.
That's profesor Summerlee, the eminent coleopterist.
- owing to lack of proofs, this
Society cannot sponsor Profesor...
...Challenger's statement, but is glad to afford him this opportunity to state his case, and, we trust, clear his name.
Bring on your mastodons!
Bring on your mammoths!
I will - if any of you spineless worms are brave enough to go back with me...
...into the trackless jungles where these monsters live!
I told you old Challenger is sincere!
And I'm not here tonight to defend my statements - but to demand that...
...a committee be formed to go back to the Lost World with me -
Looks like a riot.
It's a beastly shame!
When dealing with undeveloped minds,
...it is useless to appeal to reason
- for they have none!
I am calling for volunteers!
Volunteers to face death - or worse
- for the sake of science.
I am sixty-seven years of age - but, because I think you are a liar and a fraud -
I accept your challenge, sir!
Accepted! Better an old fool - than a young coward!
I'm neither a student nor a scientist
- but I'd like to be counted in on this!
My friend, Sir John Roxton!
Accepted!
Your record as a hunter of big game will add weight to your testimony - if we return!
Professor Challenger,
I'd like to go on this expedition!
Probably the brain of a child
- but the body of an athlete.
Accepted.
What is your name?
Edward E. Malone -
And your occupation?
I- I'm a-a-er-a reporter, sir.
London-Record Journal.
Take me home - I've had enough of this!
Eleven Enmore Park, Kensington, West!
Professor Challenger, I've got to go on this expedition! The girl...
...I'm engaged to won't marry me until I've faced death or -
This man attacked me!
Do you give him in charge, sir?
No. I was to blame.
I intruded upon him.
Now, sir, can't we talk this expedition over sanely?
Sir John Roxton is a friend of mine-
Why didn't you mention that before?
You've hurt another nice young man!
I saw you from the dining room window!
If my husband gets abusive again - just call me!
You betrayed a glimmer of intelligence just now while talking to the policeman-
Sit down!
Do you want to join this expedition because you believe my statements are true?
Austin!
Tell Miss White
I wish to see her at once!
Have you shown Malone - the diary?
Property of Maple White?
BRONTOSAURUS
Miss Paula White - daughter of poor Maple White - the unfortunate explorer whose notebook you hold in your hands.
Miss White was her father's trained assistant.
She will tell you why she came to me.
I was in camp with jungle fever when my father...
...went up to explore that terrible plateau.
Carnivorous beast Allosaurus.
Evidently already almost externet even lea for I saw few of they.
A Living Brontosaurus
You mean that you actually saw living descendants of these monsters...
...that are supposed to have been dead for millions of years?
Yes, they were tremendous in size and ferocity.
Our bearers were so terrified they deserted-
...carrying me back to the coast - leaving my father...
...marooned up there - with those beasts -
He would go
- in spite of what we had - seen.
My husband promised to raise funds for a rescue party - but instead of...
...getting people to help him, he throws them out of windows and things!
Why, this is a great
human interest story -
And even if my paper was not convinced of the scientific value of your statements -
...it might finance a rescue party provided that the exclusive publication rights-
I'll swear not to send an article back to my paper without your full approval, sir!
If Sir John Roxton will go with me -
I believe we can make my managing editor see this thing!
I'm sure you know why I am going on this rescue party, Paula - don't you?
LIVERPOOL
AMAZON RIVER
I will not bore those whom this narrative may reach by an account of our voyage.
Eventually we found ourselves in that no-man's-land...
...which is formed by the half-defined frontiers...
...between Peru,
Brazil and Colombia.
The sealed map we promised Challenger to not open untill we arrived here is only...
...a blank page.
Excepting a miracle, our expedition seems to have come to a premature end.
May I come in?
From henceforth
I take command of this expedition.
Let it be clear that you are all perfectly helpless without me!
If that mischievious beast is to go with us,
I remain behind!
Jocko knows which berries and roots in the forest are edible, and which are poisonous...
- he will be far more use to us than you, my dear sir!
RECORD
EXPLORERS REACH LAST
OUTPOST OF CIVILIZATION
Record-Journal Party Searching for Lost Scientist to Make Way into Mystery World via Secret Rivers.
MAY NOT BE HEARD
FROM AGAIN FOR MONTHS
It's a Brazilian sloth - they always walk head downward. See the baby clinging to her?
Dear Mr. McArdle: It is three weeks since we sent back the canoes...
...and tonight we are camping at the base of the great plateau upon which...
...Maple White was marooned.
Challenger has guided us to this spot, and proven that...
...the Plateau is a fact -
...but we have no reason to believe that any monsters are roaming...
...about up there.
In fact, I don't think...
They're not cubs - but full grown
"spectacle bears" - great camp followers.
Paula says her father felled one of the trees on that pinnacle so that it dropped across...
...the chasm and made a bridge.
You can still see the stump of the old tree.
In the morning we'll climb the pinnacle - and drop the other tree over.
A Pterodactyl -
...proving definitely that the statements in poor Maple White's diary are true!
A Brontosaurus
- feeding merely on leaves.
Perfectly harmless - unless it happens to step on us.
Who would believe this! My elephant gun might as well be a bean-shooter!
Great guns!
We can't get back!
We're prisoners
- exactly like Maple White!
That means our folk are still alive!
What are you thinking of, Paula
- in this lost world of ours?
I was thinking if my father were still alive
- he would have seen our fire...
- and come to us.
An Allosaurus - a meat-eater - the most vicious pest of the ancient world.
The barrier might as well thistle-down
- and fire may not work with the next one...
- we've got to find a safe camp!
Jocko will be mighty lonesome down here without Miss.
Paula
- he climbed that big rock...
...this morning to get to her - he can't bear that girl out of his sight!
I have an idea! After supper bring all those hammocks into the tent!
We must establish camp here - our only refuge from these monsters -
...if we'll live long enough to search for your father.
Now that we've found these caves we could live here the rest of our lives -
...if we had some weapon capable of making a dent in a dinosaur!
I am now inventing such a weapon.
We can't rest until every inch of this plateau is explored!
It's miles in length - your father may have found other caves -
When I release the tree it will snap back with terrific force -
...and by calculating the curve the rock will describe as it rushes through the air-
A curve? Nonsense! Any school boy could tell you the rock will describe a parabola.
A curve!
A parabola!
I was right - you described a curve!
We'll work all night and make enough ladder to get you in the morning.
Fine! But how in thunder do you expect to get it up to us?
Bring Miss Paula to call Jocko - he'll climb anything to get to her!
There's only a small cave above this -
...but your father must be somewhere on the plateau...
- it's impossible to get away!
Do you mean we are to be here - always?
What difference does it make where we are
Paula - so long as we are - together?
But your engagement to - Gadys?
Paula, dear, we're as cut off from the world and its obligations and promises...
...as if we were on the moon.
I'm going to ask Professor
Summerlee to marry us.
You know he used to be a minister.
Go hunt up the professors
- I have something to - tell Paula-
A lovely specimen!
We'll stalk it and observe its habits!
That dormant volcano is waking!
The whole plateau will be covered in lava!
But this has been going on for hours -
I'm afraid they're lost -
If they get back we must be here to show them the way to the tunnel opening.
It's their only hope of escape!
The professors and Mr. Malone are safe - they'll be here in a minute or two!
I certainly hope that mud holds!
We're back in the world
- and its obligations.
Why should we let Gladys rob us of happiness, Paula?
I can't steal my happiness from another woman.
I'm Major Hibbard, of the
Brazilian geodetic Survey.
Yesterday I saw a cloud of smoke over the plateau -
And we smoked out quite a rat, Major!
I'd give my entrie personal fortune to get that beast to London - alive!
I'll send for men to dredge out this stream
- built a steel cage and a raft -
...and when the big rains come next month, we might float your "rat" out!
If we once could get our raft as far as the Amazon, you could charter a steamer from there!
Later - In London.
Tonight you will not jeer -
...for I have brought back a living proof of my statements!
May I ask what you mean when you say
"proof", Professor Challenger?
A living Brontosaurus
- nearly sixty feet long...
...from the nose to the tip of the tail!
Mr. Edward Malone, through whose efforts this expedition, was financed, is now superintending the unloading of the monster...
...from the ship we chartered-
The message I have been expecting has come!
I'll inform you in a moment when and where the Brontosaurus will be on view!
As we swung the cage out over the dock the cables broke-
The fall smashed the cage
- and it got out!
It's running wild
- the streets are in an uproar!
My Brontosaurus has escaped! Keep off the streets, untill I recapture it!
This is outrage - we've been hoaxed again -
Challenger should be run out of town!
How d'ydo, Gladys.
You see I'm - back.
And, as you really owe it all to me,
I hope you'll forgive me - for not waiting.
My husband, Percy Potts.
May I ask what great stunt, what heroic deed Mr. Potts performed -
...to win you, Gladys?
That was just my girlish whim!
Percy is a clerk at a store, and has never been out of London in his life!
Excuse me!
She didn't wait for me - she's married!
That's Sir John Roxton
- sportsman.
The Adventures of Prince Achmed
A silhouette film by Lotte Reiniger
A Comenius-Film Production
The Sorcerer
Dinarzade
Achmed
Peri Banu
Aladdin
The Witch
Great was the might of the African Sorcerer ln the city of the Caliph they were celebrating the ruler's birthday
The Great Caliph
"A magic horse, Exalted Caliph, which flies through the air"
Princess Dinarzade, the Caliph's daughter
Prince Achmed, her brother
"l will not part with this horse for mere gold!"
"So choose any of my treasures"
"May l have whatever l desire?"
"l swear it - by the
Beard of the Prophet!"
The Story of Prince Achmed
"How can one bring the horse back down to earth?"
"The lever at the head drives it into the air..."
"...and the lever at the tail brings it to earth"
"Does the Prince know this?"
Far from his homeland he landed on one of the magic islands of Waq Waq
The Prince was young, and brave and eager for adventure
"Who are you, maidens?"
"We serve the Princess Peri Banu, ruler of the spirit land of Waq Waq"
"Stay with us, handsome stranger"
On a neighbouring island lay a magic lake
...where every night the exquisite
Peri Banu and her attendants bathed
"Give back my cloak of feathers!"
"Come with me to my beautiful homeland"
Thus was the Princess Peri Banu taken from the land of spirits
The horse carried them to far away China
"Do not be afraid of me"
"l am yours to command to the end of time"
"You do not know the power of the spirits of Waq Waq!"
"They will kill you!"
"Allah's mercy will protect us if you will be my wife"
Meanwhile, the Sorcerer searched for his magic horse
"We will find our home and you will forget all about Waq Waq"
"l will follow you!"
"The Prince sends you this garment"
"He bids me lead you to him"
Adventures in China
The Emperor of China
The Emperor's Jester
Hither the Sorcerer brought Peri Banu to sell her to the Emperor
The Emperor smiled upon Peri Banu
"Kill her, or take her to wife!"
"Now, my brave Prince, l shall return to your sister" ln this mountain dwelt the
Sorcerer's greatest enemy...
...the Fire Mountain Witch
"How dare you come to my magic mountain?"
"The African Sorcerer brought me hither"
"He is my greatest enemy!"
"And we are friends"
The Bridegroom
"Help me free Peri Banu"
"l fear no spirits!"
"With these weapons you can conquer the spirits"
The Bride
Far below, at that moment, the wedding of Peri Banu
"We must stop the wedding"
The spirits of Waq Waq look for their mistress
"Take me to Waq Waq"
THE GATES OF WAQ WAQ...
...OPEN ONLY TO THE ONE...
...WHO...
...THE...
...MAGlC LAMP OF ALADDlN...
...POSSESSES
Aladdin and the Magic Lamp
"l am Aladdin"
"Where is the Magic Lamp?"
"Do you not have it?"
"l will tell you"
"l was a poor tailor in the city of the Caliph"
"One day l was visited by a mysterious stranger"
"Behold Dinarzade, the daughter of the Caliph"
"You shall have her, once you do something for me"
"He led me to a high mountain"
The Magic Lamp
"Fetch the Lamp"
"Give me the Lamp!"
"First let me out!"
"Then die! l have other ways to obtain the Lamp!"
"l languished long in the dark cave...
...until l succeeded in lighting the Lamp"
"What is your command, O Master?"
"l am your servant, l and all the Spirits of the Lamp"
"Take me home"
"Now l knew l could win the Princess Dinarzade"
"ln a single night l built her a splendid palace"
"Next morning the astounded Caliph visited the enchanted building"
"So she became my wife"
"The Caliph is my father,
Dinarzade - my sister"
"Tell me, what happened further?"
"One day everything vanished - the palace, Dinarzade and the Lamp"
"l fled before the fury of the Caliph"
"l set out to sea"
"A fearful storm blew up"
"And so you found me"
"Do you know who did this to you?"
"The African Sorcerer!"
"He loved Dinarzade"
"Hurry, Achmed, and free Peri Banu"
"The spirits want to kill her, because she left to follow you"
"The Sorcerer has stolen the
Magic Lamp"
"Only the Lamp can open the gates of Waq Waq"
"Kill the Sorcerer and the Lamp is yours!"
"Kill him!"
"l will try"
"Your enemy is dead!"
The Spirit Battle of Waq Waq
The spirits rose up against their faithless mistress
"Prince Achmed stands before the gates!"
"Bring out Peri Banu!"
"Summon the Spirits of the Lamp,
Aladdin!"
Yet the spirits of darkness came before him
Aladdin was overwhelmed
"The Lamp!"
The Witch intervened
Now legions of benevolent spirits streamed out of the Magic Lamp
"Behold! The palace!"
"Return and seek happiness in the land of mortals"
"Dinarzade must be in the palace"
The towers of the Caliph's city soon appeared before them
"Aladdin's palace has returned!"
Meanwhile, the call to morning prayer sounded from the minarets
The Sheik
In this world of peace and flame
Lies a palm garden of the Sahara
A blessed oasis of the sands
Where the children of Araby dwell
In happy ignorance that Civilization has passed them by.
Maidens chosen for the marriage market.
An ancients custom by which.
Wives are secured for the wealthy sons of Allah.
Zilah, one of the prizes destined for the marriage lottery.
Ruth Miller
A tribal chieftain protests the sale of his sweetheart.
Youseef...George Waggener
The Sheik, Ahmed Ben Hassan, upon whose shoulders has fallen the heritage of leadership.
Rudolph Valentino
When love is more desired than riches, it is will of Allah.
Let another be chosen.
On the way to the harems Of the rich merchants.
To obey and serve like chattel slaves.
Biskra, the Beautiful.
Gateway to the desert.
A city of adventure. Where the new civilization Rubs elbows with the old.
Are you going to attend Diana Mayo's farewell dance this evening?
I am not! I thoroughly disapprove of this young madcap's wild scheme!
The idea of Diana Mayo planing a tour alone into the desert, with only native camel-drivers and Arabs!
The subject of all the gossip, the orphan daughter of an English peer,
Lady Diana Mayo. Agnes Ayres
Her brother, Sir Aubrey, who for years has vainty striven to curb Diana's reckless spirit of daring Frank Butler
Diana's guide into the desert,
Mustapha Ali
Charles Brindley
I have a good mind to make you give up this insane trip.
I've made up my mind, dear brother.
Evening in the Monte Carlo of the Sahara
Diana, I love you. Postpone this trip and give me the right to go with you.
Marriage is captivity - the end of independence.
I am content with my life as it is.
It is the great Sheik Ahmed Ben Hassan.
He is entertaining at the Casino tonight.
Mademioselle will be disappointed- the Casino is closed to all except Arabs.
And why should a savage desert bandit keep us out of any public place?
Sheik Ahmed is not a savage.
He is a rish tribal prince, who was educated in Paris.
In Biskra his slightest wish is law.
Go to the dancer and ask if I may borrow one of her costumes for the evening.
Like a page from the Arabian Nights.
The marriage gamble Where bridge are won On the turn of a wheel.
Oh, sons of Allah! Gaze upon the charms of Halima, loveliest flower of the desert.
To the cultured English girl this marriage fair suggests the slave of the barbarous past.
The pale hands and golden hair of a white woman.
By whose invitation do you come here?
I wanted to see the savage who could bar me from this Casino.
With your permission, the savage will escort you to the door.
It is the English woman whom
I am to guide into the desert tomorrow.
Dawn- with the Arab under the lure of the defiant English girl.
Pale hands I love, Beside the Shalimar,
Where are you now?
Who lies beneath your spell?
Into the sand garden of the sun. with her brother accompanying her on the first day's journey
Don't worry, Aubrey, I shall join you in London in a month - goodbye.
Lie still, you little fool!
Her exultant dream of freedom ended- a helpless captive in the desert wastes.
Gaston, the French valet, in the Sheik's service since his school days in France.
Lucien Littlefield.
Why have you brought me here?
Are you not woman enough to know?
Do you know how beautiful you are?
I am not accustomed to having my orders disobeyed.
And I am not accustomed to obeying orders.
You will learn!
You make a very charming boy, but it was not a boy
I saw two nights ago in Biskra.
Your luggage has arrived.
You will dress for dinner.
See that Mademoiselle is given every comfort and attend to her luggage at once.
I speak French, Madame, and come to serve my master's bride.
An hour of anguished revolt, while a savage sand-storm sweeps in from the fevered wastes.
Do you think can keep me here when I am missed by my friends in Biskra?
You will not be missed until it is too late... too late for anyone to learn your whereabouts- the desert is a great hidingplace
Better remain here, for in that sand fury you would not live an hour.
You are so pretty and if I choose,
I can make you love me.
I would rather you killed me.
Master, the horses!
They have broken loose!
Through the dull slumber of despair.
Until morning tempts back.
A desire to live.
For Madame to wear the master's orders.
After a week of sullen obedience.
To my friend, Ahmed Ben Hassan from Raoul de st. Hubert
That I can at last make another visit to you in the desert.
I count the days until you meet me in Biskra. Affection stely Raoul
Pale hands I love, Beside the Shalimar,
Where are you now?
Who lies beneath your spell?
Pale hands, pink tipped!
Then it was you who sang beneath my window in Biskra?
I always sing when I am happy when events and things please me.
My friend from Paris is coming for a visit Raoul de St. Hubert,
That is why I am happy that is why I sing.
Are you going to bring him here and let him see me- like this?
You are here and so it is my wish that you should cordially receive my guest.
You will return Mademoiselle's possession to her at once.
I am leaving for Biskra to be gone three days.
During my absence, amuse yourself.
You will have the saddle horses and Gaston to keep you company.
Gaston will return your clothes.
You hate them so mush my kisses?
As the hour approaches when Diana must face the humiliating ordeal of meeting a man from her own world.
The French novelist, Dr. Raoul de St. Hubert
Adolphe Menjaou
She is very fascinating, Raoul.
Be careful - she will surely bewitch you.
"Does the past mean so little to you that you now steal white women and make love to them like a savage?"
"When an Arab sees a woman that he wants, he takes her!"
A desert bandit trespasses
In the domain of the Sheik Ahmed,
Under the guise of a holy caravan.
Omair, the bandit.
Walter Long
"Where is Gaston?
What are you doing here?"
I did not have the courage to face the stranger.
Oh, be kind to me Ahmed, please!
If I had arrived a moment later, you would have been picked up by that caravan and carried away from me.
At dinner St. Hubert reveals himself as a chivalrous gentleman of tact.
If you will permit me,
I should like to retire, sir!
You might have spared her.
My presence here!
The humiliation of meeting a man from her own world!
She is content.
Desert days bring to the captive and the novelist a closer understanding.
Your story is wonderful, but is it real?
Does there really exit such a man as you have drawn.
As tender and faithful as your hero?
I do know such a man.
One who could develop into such a character.
The men in my life have not known the meaning of tenderness.
Have thought only of themselves.
Unfortunately, beautiful women provoke in some men all that is base in their characters.
And the women pays for the beauty God has given her.
Excuse me. My ideals cannot possibly interest you.
On the contrary, they interest me profoundly.
As what. A subject for vivisection?
The victim is ready.
It will make interesting material for your next book.
If you will honor me with your friendship, my life is at your service.
Come quickly, doctor!
There been an accident!
Ahmed!
One of the men.
A gun exploded in his hand.
You see, Mademoiselle, it is all right!
In the harem of
Omair, the bandit.
The white woman of Ahmed Ben Hassan.
Bring me word of her.
Learn if she is guarded well.
I cannot ride today.
Gaston will accompany you.
You won't run away again?
I want you to carry this always.
The spies of Omair are still in the neighborhood.
I trust you.
You have not changed your mind about Mademoiselle?
Eventide, when the vast undulating sand dunes throw their shadows.
A spy of Omair, the bandit.
One more reason for restoring
Mademoiselle to her people.
Let take her with me when
I return to Biskra.
Has she bewitched you, too?
You want her for yourself!
How I have made her suffer!
Merciful Allah, why does it give me so little pleasure?
Because you love her.
Ahmed I love you
You are right. I cannot see her again.
Take her safely to Biskra.
Bid her goodbye for me. Then, my friend, return to me in my loneliness.
Do not let me fall into their hands.
The stronghold of the barbarous Omair.
Ahmed I love you
Monsieur!
Madame - Omair!
Nightfall on the oasis.
Where the tribal clans gather.
At the call of their chiftain.
I have sent for reinforcements.
When they arrive let them follow.
Bring forth the white gazelle and guard closely the jealous one.
Ahmed! Ahmed!
Call, beautiful one! Your lover will not come! He has forgotten you.
Is he dying?
It rest with Allah.
We must get him away from here.
White tribal hearts appeal to Allah.
He is sleeping.
There is still hope.
His hands is so large an Arab.
He is not an Arab. His father was an Englishman, his mother a Spaniard.
Twenty-five years ago the old
Sheik Ben Hassan found Ahmed's mother and father deserted by their escort.
Left to die on the desert.
Growing to manhood as an Arab, he was sent to Paris to be educated and upon the Sheik's death, returned to the desert to assume leadership of the tribe.
Pray God, dear friend, to save his life.
Oh, if He would only accept my life in exchange for his!
Diana, my beloved!
The darkness has passed and now the sunshine.
All things are with Allah!
{529}{692}HAPPINESS MUST BE EARNED
{797}{972}Praise be to Allah- the Beneficent King-|The Creator of the Universe-
{976}{1142}...Lord of the Three Worlds!|The Koran
{1164}{1314}Verily the works of those gone|before us have become
{1318}{1468}instances and examples to men|of our modern day,
{1472}{1622}that folk may view what admonishing chances|befel other folk and may there...
{1626}{1756}from take the warning.|INTRODUCTION TO THE ARABIAN NIGHTS
{1786}{2002}A street in Bagdad, dream city|of the ancient East...
{4601}{4790}If it be his purse, let|him tell what is in it.
{4895}{4950}'Tis empty.
{8983}{9052}The magic basket...
{9921}{10046}The magic rope of Ispahán...
{10050}{10175}...woven from a witch's hair in|the caverns of the Jinn.
{12678}{12829}Come to prayer! Come to prayer!|Come to prayer!
{15891}{15991}O true believers, gathered in...
{15995}{16095}...this sacred mosque,|earn thy happiness...
{16099}{16195}...in the name of the|true God...
{16381}{16481}Toil... for by toil the sweets
{16485}{16565}...of human life are found
{16770}{16832}Thou liest!
{17542}{17692}What I want - I take.|My reward is here.
{17696}{17862}Paradise is a fool's dream and Allah is a myth.
{18431}{18506}Honest citizens of Bagdad,
{18510}{18610}...here is a thief to be flogged.
{19914}{20024}Let all thieves beware! Four|and twenty lashes for the
{20028}{20141}stealing of this jewel.
{21387}{21469}Alms! O ye merciful!|Alms!
{22978}{23140}Rouse yourself, bird of evil.|I have brought home treasure.
{24258}{24473}It is a magic rope. With it we can|scale the highest walls.
{24724}{24849}In far eastern Asia, a Mongol Prince|in his...
{24853}{24981}...Palace at Ho Sho...
{25755}{25857}The Palace of the Caliph of Bagdad.
{26141}{26286}It shall be mine. What|I want - I take.
{26572}{26657}Celestial Majesty, at the next moon,
{26661}{26761}...suitors do go to Bagdad,
{26765}{26849}...seeking in marriage its royal Princess.
{27197}{27307}The gods of our dynasty|direct us.
{27311}{27425}We shall enter Bagdad|as a suitor.
{27828}{28050}Open wide the gates of Bagdad!|Open wide the gates of Bagdad!
{28139}{28300}We be porters bound for| the Palace of the Caliph.
{28350}{28500}We bear gifts and viands to feast|the suitors who, on the tomorrow,
{28504}{28650}...come to woo our Princess.
{32103}{32186}Tonight - with the magic rope.
{33252}{33348}Beasts and scimitars|guard the Palace.
{34744}{34890}When night reaches|its noon...
{40583}{40652}The Princess sleeps.
{49766}{49860}The treasure-where is it?
{49978}{50016}'This here-
{50522}{50660}The melody of the oriental night|dies in the dawn.
{50664}{50794}And it is morning-.
{51181}{51281}It is the birthday of our Princess...
{51285}{51446}and royal suitors come from all the East|to seek her hand in marriage.
{51756}{51978}On the balcony of the Princess,|a slave girl reads a fortune-
{52582}{52689}The sands of Mecca|shape a rose.
{52854}{52954}This is the meaning:
{52958}{53145}Thou wilt wed the suitor who first|toucheth the rose-tree in thy garden.
{56505}{56556}'This here-
{56593}{56637}'This here-
{57012}{57116}Nizzy noodle!|He's turned love-bird.
{58934}{59065}She is a rare jewel, my love-bird.
{59389}{59496}Something beyond your reach,| you prince of thieves.
{59746}{59896}Yet- once upon a time- a Princesa|was stolen from a Palace...
{59900}{60050}under the very eye of Harun-al-Rashid.
{60409}{60559}They found a way into the Palace|and, with a subtle drug, they...
{60563}{60711}...drowsed her and carrier her away.
{61303}{61419}The suitors are at the Palace gates.
{61725}{61868}The Prince of the Indies whose palace|is covered with an hundred thousand rubies.
{62325}{62481}He glowers. I like him not -|with all his rubies.
{62508}{62634}Allah grant he touch|not the rose-tree.
{62830}{62934}He touched not the rose-tree.
{63359}{63484}In the bazaars of the sleepy merchants,|thy nimble fingers can ...
{63488}{63595}...procure us princely raiment.
{64061}{64146}The Prince of Persia whose fathers|fought at Feyjoo...
{64150}{64270}...five hundred years ago.
{64686}{64847}He's fat and gross as if he fed on lard.
{65268}{65394}Praise Allah! He touched not the rose-tree.
{65492}{65647}The bazaars of the merchants...
{66982}{67152}Cham Shang the Great,|Prince of Mongols, King of Ho Sho...
{67156}{67323}...Governor of Wah Hoo|and the Island of Wak.
{67970}{68070}Bagdad is a mighty city.
{68074}{68217}Fail I to win the Princess,|it shall be mine by strategy.
{68740}{68869}O horrible! He chills|my blood with fear!
{69221}{69431}Ahmed, Prince of the Isles, of the|Seas, and of the Seven Palaces.
{69538}{69735}Ahmed, Prince of the Isles, of the|Seas, and of the Seven Palaces.
{70049}{70163}See how he rides - |a Prince indeed!
{70447}{70664}'This he would make me happy. Allah|guide him to touch the rose.
{70797}{71018}Ahmed, Prince of the Isles, of the|Seas, and of the Seven Palaces.
{71098}{71195}There's no such rank nor title.
{71505}{71630}Celestial Majesty,|the superstition of the Princess...
{71634}{71799}...centers on that rose-tree.|Fail not to touch it.
{73410}{73560}How tragic, O Prince,|if you had been killed...
{73564}{73690}...and an end put to your|illustrious family.
{74064}{74164}We must make haste to steal her.
{74168}{74259}The Mongol pig suspect us.
{75891}{76005}Prince of the Isles and the Seas.
{79118}{79234}Behold! Allah foretold thee with a rose.
{83605}{83752}We must away from here.|'Twas wrong to come.
{84014}{84101}The Caliph awaits the suitors.
{85176}{85338}To possess Bagdad I have|now a two-fold reason.
{85726}{85833}In the Throne Room....
{86110}{86189}The Prince of the Indies...
{86288}{86354}The Prince of Persia.
{86551}{86635}The Prince of the Mongols...
{86843}{87044}The Just One, the Holy, the High-Born...|the Caliph of Bagdad.
{87107}{87232}The Princess, according to ancient custom|of our House...
{87236}{87336}...hath made her choice.
{87903}{88078}Let her ring be placed upon|the hand of the chosen.
{88836}{88931}He has not wed her yet.
{89832}{89991}My daughter's choice and heir|to the throne of Bagdad.
{90037}{90137}The word is said.
{90141}{90241}If any have protest, voice it now.
{90245}{90345}When the moon tips the cypress...
{90349}{90451}...the betrothal will be consummate in feast.|Come.
{92218}{92366}He is the thief who yesternight|did rob the Palace.
{93136}{93311}Desecration most foul, O mighty Caliph,|hath been wrought upon thy noble House!
{93315}{93465}This Ahmed is but a common thief.
{94719}{94894}This Ahmed who calls himself a Prince,|hunt him down!
{95860}{95938}I am not a Prince.
{96278}{96465}I am less than the slave who serves you..|a wretched outcast... a thief.
{97197}{97410}What i wanted, I took.|I wanted you... I tried to take you...
{97473}{97623}But, when I held you in my arms...|the very world did change.
{97627}{97763}The evil in me died.
{98341}{98567}I can bear a thousand tortures,|endure a thousand deaths...|but not thy tears.
{98709}{98872}This Arab Prince is but a thief.|Seek him out!
{99253}{99470}Quick! Hide thyself. If thou art|found with me, they will be merciless.
{100020}{100089}I love you.
{101564}{101712}Thou dog! What torments|can we devise for thee!
{101955}{102033}Flog him!
{103311}{103475}Fling him to the ape!|Let him be torn to pieces.
{104899}{105024}A pearl to every guard.
{105028}{105184}Have him placed in safety through|the secret panel into the streets.
{105640}{105718}She shall choose again.
{106012}{106104}The secret panel into the streets...
{107108}{107182}Choose! I command you.
{107512}{107615}I myself will make the choice.
{107947}{108022}Betray not the sands of Mecca.
{108026}{108140}Gain time. Defer the outcome.
{108837}{108962}Send them to distant lands to seek some rare treasure.
{108966}{109091}At the seventh moon let them return.
{109095}{109248}Who brings the rarest treasure I will wed.
{109593}{109777}When marriage plans have gone amiss,|The seventh moon betokens bliss.
{110265}{110333}Morning...
{112192}{112317}Come, if you still wouldst steal her.
{112321}{112449}I have found a way through|the tunnels of the tigers.
{113252}{113401}The Princes will return at the|seventh moon bearing treasure.
{113405}{113530}The one who brings the rarest wins the Princess.
{114047}{114212}Lose not thy hope, the rose persists,|and something good will come of this.
{115186}{115352}Turned lily-white he now goes|mewling to the mosque. Bah!
{116351}{116397}Thou art wounded.
{116631}{116705}In heart and soul.
{117068}{117138}I love a Princess.
{117283}{117364}Make thyself a Prince.
{117658}{117773}Allah hath made thy soul|to yearn for happiness...
{117777}{117881}...but thou must earn it.
{118479}{118554}Stay you in Bagdad.
{118558}{118658}I will send soldiers under guise|of porters bearing gifts.
{118662}{118742}Build me an army within the walls.
{119639}{119811}And so.. on the bedrock of humility|thou canst build any structure.
{119904}{119989}Come with me and I will set thy feet...
{119993}{120099}...on the path that leads to treasure|beyond thy dreams.
{120515}{120590}Three suitors leave thy city gate...
{120594}{120682}...But four are numbered in her fate.
{121162}{121243}At the end of the way is a silver chest...
{121247}{121328}...that doth contain the greatest magic.
{121332}{121429}Thou must be brave. Go now.|Control thy destiny.
{121917}{122045}Give this to her who hath|already my heart.
{122694}{122824}A day's journey from Bagdad...|a caravansary in the desert...
{123135}{123256}Thus far the three Princes|have traveled in company.
{123410}{123485}Great Lords of Asia,|good fortune to you...
{123489}{123565}...second only to mine own!
{123569}{123644}Let us meet here at the end|of the sixth moon.
{124823}{124900}Set spies to follow each.
{125355}{125459}A Defile in the Mountains|of Dread Adventure...
{125751}{125832}The Hermit of the Defile.
{125972}{126130}I seek a magic chest that|lies beyond this defile.
{126263}{126353}Knowest thou, rash youth...|devouring flames,
{126357}{126456}...foul monsters, shapes of death|beset the path?
{126532}{126607}A hundred years have I been here.
{126611}{126731}Many have gone this way|and none returned.
{126773}{126927}But, if thy resolve be firm,|I will help thee.
{126964}{127089}If thou dost reach the Cavern|of Enchanted Trees...
{127093}{127231}...touch with this talisman the midmost tree.
{128159}{128274}In Bagdad, the pavilion|of the Princess...
{128682}{128804}He too may return by the seventh moon.
{129111}{129259}... but his road is hard.|You must pray for him.
{129624}{129760}The first moon.
{129823}{129897}The Valley of Fire...
{131879}{131936}The second moon.
{131990}{132198}In search of rare treasure, The Persian Prince|came to the bazaars of Shiraz.
{132855}{132978}A crippled beggar knew a priceless secret.
{133121}{133250}The magic carpet.|They know not its value.
{133987}{134072}My Prince, here is|the greatest rarity in the world,
{134076}{134164}...the flying carpet.
{134788}{134895}The third moon.
{134956}{135086}The Valley of the Monsters.
{136705}{136854}The Cavern of the Enchanted Trees.
{137703}{137783}Thou hast shown great courage...
{137787}{137866}...but thy way is yet hard.
{138196}{138391}This is the chart to guide thee to|the Old Man of the Midnight Sea.
{139582}{139695}The fourth moon.
{139749}{139874}In search of rare treasure,|the Prince of the Indies...
{139878}{140028}...came to a forgotten idol|near Kandahar.
{143056}{143226}This is the greatest rarity in|the world, the magic crystal.
{143728}{143835}The fifth moon.
{143862}{144023}The Old Man of the|Midnight Sea.
{144771}{144921}At the bottom of the sea|is an iron-bound box.
{144925}{145071}There thou wilt find a star-shaped key.
{150886}{151035}Now you must climb to the|Abode of the Winged Horse.
{151039}{151217}That star-shaped key will|give you entrance here.
{151312}{151429}The Abode of the|Winged Horse...
{152458}{152566}The sixth moon.
{152632}{152782}In search of rare treasure,|the Prince of the Mongols...
{152786}{152915}...came to the Island of Wak.
{153144}{153260}A court magician knew|a secret shrine.
{155691}{155761}The magic apple...
{156534}{156591}That fisherman.
{159913}{160039}Far rarer than India's crystal|or Persia's carpet.
{160291}{160361}Thou wilt haste to Bagdad and,|at the end of
{160365}{160442}this sixth moon, give order|that the Prince be poisoned.
{160488}{160616}The Citadel of the Moon...
{161003}{161159}The magic chest is wrapped|in a cloak of invisibility.
{161537}{161724}The Cloak of Invisibility|and the Magic Chest...
{162607}{162714}At the end of the|sixth moon...
{164765}{164975}A day's journey from Bagdad..|again the caravansary in the desert.
{166231}{166313}Let us haste to Bagdad.
{166643}{166768}O Prince of the Indies,|discover this with the crystal.
{166772}{166921}...Does the Princess wait as she pledged?
{167966}{168032}Spread the flying carpet.
{168203}{168349}With the magic apple we|shall save her life.
{169337}{169457}The learned doctor,|Zakariya of Kufa.
{171783}{171845}Out of the clouds...
{174871}{174996}I was at the portals of death|and now I glow with health.
{175000}{175089}...What miracle is this?
{175439}{175489}I was I who brought you back.
{175493}{175611}No other gift can match|my golden apple.
{176006}{176105}He makes rash claim.|'Twas this rare crystal...
{176109}{176175}...disclosed your desperate plight.
{176590}{176679}My magic carpet brought us here.
{176683}{176799}By the beard of the Prophet,|it is rarest.
{177089}{177169}Her life belongs to me.
{177206}{177242}¡To me!
{177311}{177351}To me!
{177599}{177740}It is for me to decide|which gift is rarest.
{178607}{178770}A moment, O Princes!|Who can say which gift is rarest?
{178986}{179086}Without the crystal you|could not have known.
{179090}{179190}Without the carpet you could not have come.
{179194}{179297}...Without the apple you|could not have cured me.
{179357}{179457}Apple.. crystal.. carpet.|No one of them is rarest.
{179461}{179554}Each had been useless without|the other two.
{179948}{180071}Cease! There's wisdom here.|'Tis best that we deliberate.
{180365}{180440}Bide your time.
{180444}{180547}You have twenty thousand troops|within the walls.
{180769}{180917}Yourself hath said it.|'Tis best that we deliberate.
{181505}{181607}Through the night...
{183484}{183597}The Mongols are|taking the city!
{186339}{186404}Bagdad is yours!
{186717}{186842}The courier of the dawn...
{188495}{188585}We shall be wed at once.|Prepare thyself.
{188649}{188720}It is my command.
{189187}{189321}Bagdad is in the hands|of the Mongols.
{189990}{190168}You shall add joy to the wedding|festival by being boiled in oil.
{191499}{191591}Open wide the gates|of Bagdad!
{191663}{191736}Open wide the gates|of Bagdad!
{193640}{193740}Fly for your lives!|A great magician comes.
{193744}{193852}He summons armies from the earth itself!
{194598}{194683}A magic army, a hundred thousand|strong, surrounds the walls.
{194687}{194793}...Thy troops have fled.
{194856}{194971}Set my guard at|the Palace gates!
{195103}{195220}Open wide the gates|to our deliverer!
{196179}{196311}Great Khan, every way|of escape is blocked.
{197598}{197699}The flying carpet...|and the Princess.
{199136}{199202}Quick... the magic carpet.
{204150}{204270}I give thee gladly to|this great Prince.
{207519}{207611}HAPPINESS|MUST BE EARNED
{208000}{208100}ripped by Orion1
{208100}{208200}>> Napisy pobrane z http://napisy.org <<|>>>>>>>> nowa wizja napisów <<<<<<<<
Despite having more or less always been in circulation,
DIE NIBELUNGEN has never been presented in any complete German version, whether by way of any extant release print, or anything struck from an original camera negative.
This photochemical restoration is based on incomplete camera negatives.
Missing sections were supplemented by various extant prints of the period along with archival copies.
Colouration follows the conventional method of then-contemporary prints, and is based upon original tinting technique:
The production of a B&W print, with subsequent staining performed in a dye-bath.
The German intertitles were taken from extant prints and flash-titles restored digitally from the negatives.
Missing titles that have been reconstructed are designated by the Murnau-Stiftung logo.
For this HD mastering, the image has been corrected in places, and heavy damage to the film has been retouched.
THE NIBELUNGEN
Director: Fritz Lang
Scenario: Thea von Harbou
Cinematography:
Carl Hoffmann and Günther Rittau
Set Design and Construction: Otto Hunte
Set Collaborators:
Erich Kettelhut and Karl Vollbrecht
Costume Design: Paul Gerd Guderian
Make-Up: Otto Genath
Music: Gottfried Huppertz
Costumes and Props for the Huns:
Heinrich Umlauff
Cast:
Kriemhild: Margarete Schön
Queen Ute: Gertrud Arnold
King Gunther: Theodor Loos
Gerenot: Hans Carl Müller
Giselher: Erwin Biswanger
Volker von Alzey: Bernhard Goetzke
Hagen Tronje: Hans Adalbert Schlettow
Dankwart: Hardy von François
The Priest: Georg Jurowski
The Noble Boy: Iris Roberts
König Etzel (King Attila):
Rudolf Klein-Rogge
Blaodel, His Brother: Georg John
Werbel, the Bard: Hubert Heinrich
Margrave Rüdiger von Bechlarn:
Rudolf Rittner
Dietlind, His Daughter: Aenne Röttgen
Dietrich von Bern: Fritz Alberti
Hildebrand: Georg August Koch
Thea von Harbou's script for thefilm Die Nibelungen, with 24 images from the production, is published by
Drei Masken Verlag, Munich.
THE NIBELUNGEN
Dedicated to the German People
KRIEMHILD'S REVENGE
The First Canto:
How Kriemhild Mourned Siegfried, and How König Etzel (King Attila)
Courted Her
Through Rüdiger von Bechlarn.
King Gunther, Margrave Rüdiger von Bechlarn asks for an audience!
I come as ambassador to King Attila.
He who is called the Lord of the Earth -
He who seeks the hand of your sister Kriemhild in marriage.
I am afraid King Attila knows not whom he woos.
In the name of Siegfried, who was murdered and whose murderer lives!
Keep in mind how Siegfried died!
Lord Attila sends me, O Queen, to ask for your hand on his behalf!
You seem to know quite well, Rüdiger, that I have been exposed to grievous wrongs in the house of my clan!
Brother! Where is your brother Siegfried?
Deliver unto me the murderer of my husband, O King!
He has remained loyal to me; so shall I remain loyal to him.
This, Kriemhild, is my final word!
Lady Kriemhild, Margrave Rüdiger, wishes to speak with you after evensong!
Now, Gerenot, is the time to keep close watch over Burgundy!
Speak to me of Lord Attila, Rüdiger!
You court a dead woman, Rüdiger!
He who murdered my husband flaunts the greensparkling sword that he stole from the dead man.
If ever you were done wrong at Attila's court, my lady,
- Lord Attila would know how to avenge you!
Lord Margrave, swear this unto me in your and in King Attila's names!
Not on the cross, Lord Margrave,
- on the sharp edge of your sword!
My lady! Lord Hagen has stolen the Treasure!
You have my word,
Lord Margrave Rüdiger!
Hagen Tronje, where is the Treasure?
Thus spake loyal Hagen:
Somewhere, my lady, where no-one might use the gold to forge arms against the kings of Burgundy!
Thus ends the First Canto.
The Second Canto:
How Kriemhild Fled Her Homeland, and How She Was Received by Lord Attila.
You have drunk Siegfried's blood, O Earth!
One day I shall drench you with Hagen Tronje's blood!
I shall return! Rest assured, I shall return!
My daughter, shall you not proffer your hand in farewell to your brother Gunther?
No, mother.
You are heading far away, Lady Kriemhild.
Don't you want to make peace with your family first?
No, my priest.
Don't you even once want to hail your people, my lady?
No, Rüdiger.
As Kriemhild approached, springtime blossomed in the land of the Huns.
That sack full of gold is mine!
The queen is coming!
Meet her, brother!
Royal jewellery!
My lady, King Attila's brother,
Blaodel, gives thee welcome!
Choose for yourself a kingdom from my lands, Rüdiger, in gratitude for this woman!
Ask King Attila, Margrave Rüdiger, whether he is prepared to make your oath his own!
Upon my oath, O Queen:
Any man who insults you or does you wrong shall die a hundredfold death!
Thus ends the Second Canto.
The Third Canto:
How King Attila Besieged Rome and How Kriemhild
Summoned Her Brothers.
Lord Attila swore he wanted to turn Rome's churches into stables for our horses!
Why does Lord Attila no longer uphold his oath?
We traipsed headlong into war!
Why don't we ride further onward?
Why is Lord Attila's horse tethered to his tent?
A great horseman was King Attila!
A mighty mare for him was the world!
Lord Attila whipped the world - his mare!
What does Lord Attila do now?
He sleeps! He sleeps!
Lord Attila, Attila sleeps!
This white woman has stolen Attila from underneath our noses!
With her tresses does she bind up the horseman,
The great horseman, Lord Attila!
This white woman has stolen Attila from underneath our noses!
With her tresses does she bind up the horseman,
The great horseman, Lord Attila!
My lord -! Kriemhild...
My lord -! Kriemhild has borne you a son!
O Earth... sacred Earth...
One wish, O Queen!
One wish that I might fulfill for you!
If you would honour me and make me happy, Lord Attila, then summon my brothers as guests to your court!
To Worms, Blaodel, to request as guests to our court the royal brothers of my wife!
Thus ends the Third Canto.
The Fourth Canto:
How Kriemhild Received Her Brothers.
For more than one moon's time your brothers stayed as guests of Rüdiger in the house of Bechlarn.
The minstrels sing a new song of the love between your brother Giselher and Rüdiger's only child, the beautiful Dietlind!
And so I bind in faith -
Bechlarn and Burgundy:
One heart, one life, one death!
To honour your brothers,
Lord Attila has sent the noblest of his knights -
Dietrich von Bern - to greet them.
Once more, Nibelungen, before Lord Attila comes to greet you:
Forget not to whom Attila leads thee!
How could we forget, my lord, that we come to visit our sister Kriemhild?
Whoever wants to win my gratitude shall bear my sorrow in mind!
It was the day of the summer solstice, and the Nibelungen arrived at Attila's court.
King Attila, I now exhort you to your oath!
Siegfried's murderer is in your hands!
Think upon my sorrow!
Will you never forget
Lord Siegfried, my lady?
Hagen Tronje shall fight me for his life!
You mustn't fight with the murderer, Attila!
You must have the murderer killed!
Have our guest killed?
You swore to me, Attila!
On the life of your child:
Make good upon your oath!
I hail from a desert land, O Queen.
If only one thing is sacred, it is a guest!
So long as Hagen Tronje regards the peace of my house, he shall be left in peace!
She spoke: Whoever wants to win my gratitude shall bear my sorrow in mind!
Whoever brings me the head of Tronje,
I shall fill his shield with gold!
But I beseech you:
Do no harm to the sons of my mother!
Play on, bard!
Thus ends the Fourth Canto.
The Fifth Canto:
How the Huns Celebrated the Summer Solstice with the Nibelungen.
Is it the fashion at Worms upon the Rhine to sit at table armed from head to foot?
Lord Hagen Tronje knows why he never lays aside his sword!
Methinks that at such a feast the heir to all Attila's crowns mustn't be absent!
Methinks the boy will not live long.
Scarcely shall we as guests attend any court of his!
Treason!
The child!
The work of your guest, Lord Attila!
Now, Nibelungen, you are fair game!
I demand safe conduct from this hall for myself and my men!
Thus ends the Fifth Canto.
The Sixth Canto:
The Nibelungen's Distress.
Alert Lady Kriemhild of what it is you see!
Open the gate!
No Hun survives any longer in Attila's hall!
Avenge thy dead, Huns!
O Queen, it is impossible!
Avenge thy dead, Huns, and the royal child!
Sister!
Sister! Consider your mother!
Hand over Siegfried's murderer - and you shall be free!
The fight is too uneven!
Not one of the Nibelungen will gaze upon this next dawn.
In Giselher does my own child die!
Stay out of it, Rüdiger!
Blood shall follow blood!
Get me Rüdiger!
The time is nigh, Lord Rüdiger!
Make good upon your oath!
Lord Margrave Rüdiger,
I demand from you Siegfried's murderer!
You do not send me against Hagen Tronje,
- you send me against your brothers, my lady, who defend him with their very lives!
You've sworn an oath, Rüdiger!
You've sworn it upon the sharp edge of your sword!
I engaged my only child to Giselher!
Blood shall follow blood, Lord Rüdiger!
My lord! Do not force me to kill my only child!
Thus ends the Sixth Canto.
The Seventh Canto:
The Nibelungen's End.
Lord Rüdiger stands before the gate!
He will bring us peace!
What do you bring us, father?
Death!
My lord, do not allow they who love one another to kill one another!
Tell them:
They must deliver unto me the murderer of my child
- and they are free!
You know not the German soul, Lord Attila!
The oath I made to Kriemhild is older than the oath between myself and you!
Don't force me to break my oath! Fight!
Do you wish me to lose my honour?! -
Defend yourself, Hagen Tronje!
O sister, what you have wrought!
Deliver Hagen unto me - and you are free!
Exalt in your revenge, Kriemhild!
Your younger brother is dead!
Rüdiger and his men are dead!
But Hagen Tronje lives on, who slew your Siegfried!
Hurl fire into the hall!
My lord! The Queen bids the hall be bombarded with fire arrows!
The palace is burning!
Lady Kriemhild is right, she is more than right!
I myself will stand at her side as the fire flushes the murderer Hagen from his hole!
You have my thanks, Kriemhild!
Although we were never united in love, we will, in the end, yet be united in hate!
Never, King Attila, was my heart so filled with love as now!
I don't want King Gunther of Burgundy to die a smoky death!
I shall offer Lady Kriemhild my head!
Speak, ye Nibelungen, will you buy your lives with Hagen Tronje's head?!
Loyalty, unbroken by iron, also will not melt in fire, Hagen Tronje!
Look! Volker prepares his fiddle for one final song!
I call it a shame and a disgrace,
Lady Kriemhild, that you let these heroes whom you could not defeat in battle be annihilated in fiery distress!
Do you hear? Lord Volker is singing!
O, that we were on the cool, green Rhine!
Do you hear? Lord Volker is singing!
You are no human being,
Lady Kriemhild -!
No! I died when Siegfried died...
An end -! An end -!
One vassal still lives, Lord Attila!
I cannot go home to my dead Siegfried before having atoned for every wrong...
Here is the sword, Lord Hagen.
Where is the Treasure?
I swore never to betray the location of the Treasure so long as one of my kings still lives!
Now, Kriemhild, no-one knows anything of the Treasure other than God and myself!
And God is no more discreet than I!
Now, Earth, drink your fill!
Deliver her home to Siegfried, her dead husband!
She belonged to no other man!
Here does the myth have an end.
Restoration:
With the collaboration of:
The following partners also contributed to the restoration:
Film restoration laboratory:
Consultation on image quality and tinting:
Original score:
Reconstruction and synchronisation:
Music in ZDF/Arte Edition:
Recorded with:
Musical director:
Sound mixers:
Synch editing:
Sound engineer:
Musical production of:
Editorial:
Director of production:
A co-production of:
Improvements by (c) dCd / July 2014
Original by (c) tai_tan & MaRio & Others (thanks!)
